A HUNTING DINNER.
I was
once at a hunting dinner, given by a
worthy fox-hunting old Baronet, who kept
Bachelor's
Hall in jovial style, in an ancient
rook-haunted
family mansion, in one of the middle
counties. He had been a devoted admirer of the
fair sex in his young days; but having travelled
much, studied the sex in various countries with
distinguished success, and returned home
profoundly
instructed, as he supposed, in the ways
of woman, and a perfect master of the art of
pleasing, he had the mortification of being jilted
by a little boarding school girl, who was scarcely
versed in the accidence of love.
The Baronet was completely overcome by
such an incredible defeat; retired from the world
in disgust, put himself under the government of
his housekeeper, and took to fox hunting like a
perfect Jehu. Whatever poets may say to the
contrary, a man will grow out of love as he
grows old; and a pack of fox hounds may chase
out of his heart even the memory of a boarding
school goddess. The Baronet was when I saw
him as merry and mellow an old bachelor as
ever followed a hound; and the love he had once
felt for one woman had spread itself over the
whole sex; so that there was not a pretty face
in the whole country round, but came in for a
share.
The dinner was prolonged till a late hour;
for our host having no ladies in his household
to summon us to the drawing room, the bottle
maintained its true bachelor sway, unrivalled by
its potent enemy the tea-kettle. The old hall
in which we dined echoed to bursts of robustious
fox hunting merriment, that made the ancient
antlers shake on the walls. By degrees,
however
,
the wine and wassail of mine host began
to operate upon bodies already a little jaded by
the chase. The choice spirits that flashed up at
the beginning of the dinner, sparkled for a time,
then gradually went out one after another, or
only emitted now and then a faint gleam from
the socket. Some of the briskest talkers, who
had given tongue so bravely at the first burst, fell
fast asleep; and none kept on their way but
certain of those long-winded prosers, who, like
short legged hounds, worry on unnoticed at the
bottom of conversation, but are sure to be in at
the death. Even these at length subsided into
silence; and scarcely any thing was heard but
the nasal communications of two or three
veteran
masticators, who, having been silent while
awake, were indemnifying the company in their
sleep.
At length the announcement of tea and coffee
in the cedar parlour roused all hands from this
temporary torpor. Every one awoke
marvellously
renovated, and while sipping the refreshing
beverage out of the Baronet's old-fashioned
hereditary
china, began to think of departing for
their several homes. But here a sudden
difficulty
arose. While we had been prolonging our
repast, a heavy winter storm had set in, with
snow, rain, and sleet, driven by such bitter blasts
of wind, that they threatened to penetrate to the
very bone.
It's all in vain, said our hospitable host,
to think of putting one's head out of doors in
such weather. So, gentlemen, I hold you my
guests for this night at least, and will have your
quarters prepared accordingly.
The unruly weather, which became more and
more tempestuous, rendered the hospitable
suggestion
unanswerable. The only question was,
whether such an unexpected accession of
company
,
to an already crowded house, would not put
the housekeeper to her trumps to accommodate
them.
Pshaw, cried mine host, did you ever
know of a Bachelor's Hall that was not elastic,
and able to accommodate twice as many as it
could hold? So out of a good humoured pique
the housekeeper was summoned to consultation
before us all. The old lady appeared, in her gala
suit of faded brocade, which rustled with flurry
and agitation, for in spite of mine host's bravado,
she was a little perplexed. But in a bachelor's
Part I. 3
house, and with bachelor guests, these matters
are readily managed. There is no lady of the
house to stand upon squeamish points about
lodging guests in odd holes and corners, and
exposing
the shabby parts of the establishment. A
bachelor's housekeeper is used to shifts and
emergencies
.
After much worrying to and fro; and
divers consultations about the red room, and the
blue room, and the chintz room, and the damask
room, and the little room with the bow window,
the matter was finally arranged.
When all this was done, we were once more
summoned to the standing rural amusement of
eating. The time that had been consumed in
dozing after dinner, and in the refreshment and
consultation of the cedar parlour, was sufficient,
in the opinion of the rosy-faced butler, to
engender
a reasonable appetite for supper. A slight
repast had therefore been tricked up from the
residue
of dinner, consisting of a cold sirloin of beef;
hashed venison; a devilled leg of a turkey or so,
and a few other of those light articles taken by
country gentlemen to ensure sound sleep and
heavy snoring.
The nap after dinner had brightened up every
one's wit; and a great deal of excellent humour
was expended upon the perplexities of mine host
and his housekeeper, by certain married
gentlemen
of the company, who considered themselves
privileged in joking with a bachelor's
establishment
.
From this the banter turned as to what
quarters each would find, on being thus suddenly
billeted in so antiquated a mansion.
By my soul, said an Irish captain of
dragoons
,
one of the most merry and boisterous of
the partyby my soul, but I should not be
surprised
if some of those good-looking gentlefolks
that hang along the walls, should walk about the
rooms of this stormy night; or if I should find
the ghost of one of these long-waisted ladies
turning
into my bed in mistake for her grave in the
church-yard.
Do you believe in ghosts, then? said a thin
hatchet-faced gentleman, with projecting eyes
like a lobster.
I had remarked this last personage throughout
dinner time for one of those incessant questioners,
who seem to have a craving, unhealthy, appetite
in conversation. He never seemed satisfied with
the whole of a story; never laughed when others
laughed; but always put the joke to the
question
.
He could never enjoy the kernel of the
nut, but pestered himself to get more out of the
shell.
Do you believe in ghosts, then? said the
inquisitive gentleman.
Faith, but I do, replied the jovial Irishman;
I was brought up in the fear and belief of them:
we had a Benshee in our own family, honey.
A Bensheeand what's that? cried the
questioner.
Why an old lady ghost that tends upon your
real Milesian families, and wails at their window
to let them know when some of them are to die.
A mighty pleasant piece of information,
cried an elderly gentleman, with a knowing look
and a flexible nose, to which he could give a
whimsical twist when he wished to be waggish.
By my soul, but I'd have you know it's a
piece of distinction to be waited upon by a
Benshee
.
It's a proof that one has pure blood in
one's veins. But, egad, now we're talking of
ghosts, there never was a house or a night better
fitted than the present for a ghost adventure.
Faith, Sir John, have'nt you such a thing as a
haunted chamber to put a guest in?
Perhaps, said the Baronet smiling, I
might accommodate you even on that point.
Oh, I should like it of all things, my jewel.
Some dark oaken room, with ugly wo-begone
portraits that stare dismally at one, and about
which the housekeeper has a power of delightful
stories of love and murder. And then a dim
lamp, a table with a rusty sword across it, and a
spectre all in white to draw aside one's curtains
at midnight
In truth, said an old gentleman at one end
of the table, you put me in mind of an
anecdote
Oh, a ghost story! a ghost story! was
vociferated
round the board, every one edging his
chair a little nearer.
The attention of the whole company was now
turned upon the speaker. He was an old
gentleman
,
one side of whose face was no match for
the other. The eyelid drooped and hung down
like an unhinged window shutter. Indeed, the
whole side of his head was dilapidated, and
seemed like the wing of a house shut up and
haunted. I'll warrant that side was well stuffed
with ghost stories.
There was a universal demand for the tale.
Nay, said the old gentleman, it's a mere
anecdoteand a very commonplace one; but
such as it is you shall have it. It is a story that I
once heard my uncle tell when I was a boy. But
whether as having happened to himself or to
another
,
I cannot recollect. But no matter, it's very
likely it happened to himself, for he was a man
very apt to meet with strange adventures. I
have heard him tell of others much more
singular
.
At any rate, we will suppose it happened
to himself.
What kind of man was your uncle? said
the questioning gentleman.
Why, he was rather a dry, shrewd kind of
body; a great traveller, and fond of telling his
adventures.
Pray, how old might he have been when this
happened?
When what happened? cried the gentleman
with the flexible nose, impatientlyEgad, you
have not given any thing a chance to happen
come, never mind our uncle's age; let us have
his adventures.
The inquisitive gentleman being for the
moment
silenced, the old gentleman with the
haunted
head proceeded.
THE
ADVENTURE OF MY UNCLE.
Many
years since, a long time before the
French revolution, my uncle had passed several
months at Paris. The English and French
were on better terms, in those days, than at
present
,
and mingled cordially together in society.
The English went abroad to spend money then,
and the French were always ready to help them:
they go abroad to save money at present, and
that they can do without French assistance.
Perhaps the travelling English were fewer and
choicer then, than at present, when the whole
nation has broke loose, and inundated the
continent
.
At any rate, they circulated more readily
and currently in foreign society, and my uncle,
during his residence at Paris, made many very
intimate acquaintances among the French
noblesse
.
Some time afterwards, he was making a
journey
in the winter time, in that part of
Normandy
called the Pays de Caux, when, as evening
was closing in, he perceived the turrets of an
ancient chateau rising out of the trees of its
walled park, each turret with its high conical
roof of gray slate, like a candle with an
extinguisher
on it.
To whom does that chateau belong, friend?
cried my uncle to a meagre but fiery postillion,
who, with tremendous jack boots and cocked
hat, was floundering on before him.
To Monseigneur the Marquis de
said the postillion, touching his hat, partly out of
respect to my uncle, and partly out of reverence
to the noble name pronounced. My uncle
recollected
the Marquis for a particular friend in
Paris, who had often expressed a wish to see
him at his paternal chateau. My uncle was an
old traveller, one that knew how to turn things
to account. He revolved for a few moments in
his mind how agreeable it would be to his friend
the Marquis to be surprised in this sociable way
Part I. 4
by a pop visit; and how much more agreeable
to himself to get into snug quarters in a chateau,
and have a relish of the Marquis's well-known
kitchen, and a smack of his superior champagne
and burgundy; rather than take up with the
miserable lodgement, and miserable fare of a
country inn. In a few minutes, therefore, the
meagre postillion was cracking his whip like a
very devil, or like a true Frenchman, up the
long straight avenue that led to the chateau.
You have no doubt all seen French chateaus,
as every body travels in France now-a-days.
This was one of the oldest; standing naked and
alone, in the midst of a desert of gravel walks
and cold stone terraces; with a cold looking
formal garden, cut into angles and rhomboids;
and a cold leafless park, divided geometrically
by straight alleys; and two or three noseless
cold looking statues without any clothing; and
fountains spouting cold water enough to make
one's teeth chatter. At least, such was the feeling
they imparted on the wintry day of my uncle's
visit; though, in hot summer weather, I'll
warrant
there was glare enough to scorch one's eyes
out.
The smacking of the postillion's whip, which
grew more and more intense the nearer they
approached, frightened a flight of pigeons out of
the dove cote, and rooks out of the roofs; and
finally a crew of servants out of the chateau,
with the Marquis at their head. He was
enchanted
to see my uncle; for his chateau, like the
house of our worthy host, had not many more
guests at the time than it could accommodate.
So he kissed my uncle on each cheek, after the
French fashion, and ushered him into the castle.
The Marquis did the honours of his house
with the urbanity of his country. In fact, he
was proud of his old family chateau; for part
of it was extremely old. There was a tower
and chapel that had been built almost before the
memory of man; but the rest was more modern;
the castle having been nearly demolished during
the wars of the League. The Marquis dwelt
upon this event with great satisfaction, and
seemed
really to entertain a grateful feeling towards
Henry IV., for having thought his paternal
mansion
worth battering down. He had many
stories
to tell of the prowess of his ancestors, and
several skull caps, helmets and cross bows to
show; and divers huge boots and buff jerkins,
that had been worn by the Leaguers. Above
all, there was a two handled sword, which he
could hardly wield; but which he displayed as
a proof that there had been giants in his family.
In truth, he was but a small descendant from
such great warriors. When you looked at their
bluff visages and brawny limbs, as depicted in
their portraits, and then at the little Marquis,
with his spindle shanks; his sallow lanthern
visage, flanked with a pair of powdered ear-locks,
or
ailes de pigeon,
that seemed ready to fly away
with it; you would hardly believe him to be of
the same race. But when you looked at the
eyes that sparkled out like a beetle's from each
side of his hooked nose, you saw at once that
he inherited all the fiery spirit of his forefathers.
In fact, a Frenchman's spirit never exhales,
however
his body may dwindle. It rather rarifies,
and grows more inflammable, as the earthy
particles diminish; and I have seen valour
enough in a little fiery hearted French dwarf,
to have furnished out a tolerable giant.
When once the Marquis, as he was wont,
put on one of the old helmets that were stuck
up in his hall; though his head no more filled
it than a dry pea its pease cod; yet his eyes
sparkled from the bottom of the iron cavern
with the brilliancy of carbuncles; and when he
poised the ponderous two-handled sword of his
ancestors, you would have thought you saw the
doughty little David wielding the sword of
Goliah
,
which was unto him like a weaver's beam.
However, gentlemen, I am dwelling too long
on this description of the Marquis and his
chateau
;
but you must excuse me; he was an old
friend of my uncle's, and whenever my uncle told
the story, he was always fond of talking a great
deal about his host.Poor little Marquis! He
was one of that handful of gallant courtiers, who
made such a devoted, but hopeless stand in the
cause of their sovereign, in the chateau of the
Tuilleries, against the irruption of the mob, on
the sad tenth of August. He displayed the
valour of a preux French chevalier to the last;
flourished feebly his little court sword with a
sa-sa! in face of a whole legion of
sans-culottes;
but was pinned to the wall like a butterfly, by
the pike of a poissarde, and his heroic soul was
borne up to heaven on his
ailes de pigeon
.
But all this has nothing to do with my story:
to the point then:When the hour arrived for
retiring for the night, my uncle was shown to
his room, in a venerable old tower. It was the
oldest part of the chateau, and had in ancient
times been the Donjon or stronghold; of course
the chamber was none of the best. The
Marquis
had put him there, however, because he
knew him to be a traveller of taste, and fond of
antiquities; and also because the better
apartments
were already occupied. Indeed, he
perfectly
reconciled my uncle to his quarters by
mentioning the great personages who had once
inhabited them, all of whom were in some way
or other connected with the family. If you
would take his word for it, John Baliol, or as
he called him Jean de Bailleul had died of
chagrin in this very chamber on hearing of the
success of his rival, Robert the Bruce, at the
battle of Bannockburn; and when he added that
the Duke de Guise had slept in it during the
wars of the League, my uncle was fain to
felicitate
himself upon being honoured with such
distinguished quarters.
The night was shrewd and windy, and the
chamber none of the warmest. An old
longfaced
,
long-bodied servant in quaint livery, who
attended upon my uncle, threw down an armful
of wood beside the fire place, gave a queer look
about the room, and then wished him
bon repos,
with a grimace and a shrug that would have
been suspicious from any other than an old
French servant. The chamber had indeed a
wild crazy look, enough to strike any one who
had read romances with apprehension and
foreboding
.
The windows were high and narrow,
and had once been loop holes, but had been
rudely enlarged, as well as the extreme
thickness
of the walls would permit; and the
illfitted
casements rattled to every breeze. You
would have thought, on a windy night, some
of the old Leaguers were tramping and clanking
about the apartment in their huge boots and
rattling spurs. A door which stood ajar, and
like a true French door would stand ajar, in
spite of every reason and effort to the contrary,
opened upon a long dark corridor, that led the
Lord knows whither, and seemed just made for
ghosts to air themselves in, when they turned out
of their graves at midnight. The wind would
spring up into a hoarse murmur through this
passage, and creak the door to and fro, as if some
dubious ghost were balancing in its mind
whether
to come in or not. In a word, it was
precisely
the kind of comfortless apartment that a
ghost, if ghost there were in the chateau, would
single out for its favourite lounge.
My uncle, however, though a man accustomed
to meet with strange adventures, apprehended
none at the time. He made several attempts to
shut the door, but in vain. Not that he
apprehended
any thing, for he was too old a traveller
to be daunted by a wild-looking apartment; but
the night, as I have said, was cold and gusty,
something like the present, and the wind howled
about the old turret, pretty much as it does round
this old mansion at this moment; and the breeze
from the long dark corridor came in as damp
and chilly as if from a dungeon. My uncle,
therefore, since he could not close the door
threw a quantity of wood on the fire, which soon
sent up a flame in the great wide-mouthed
chimney
that illumined the whole chamber, and made
the shadow of the tongs, on the opposite wall,
look like a long-legged giant. My uncle now
clambered on top of the half score of mattresses
which form a French bed, and which stood in a
deep recess; then tucking himself snugly in, and
burying himself up to the chin in the bed clothes,
he lay looking at the fire, and listening to the
wind, and chuckling to think how knowingly
he had come over his friend the Marquis for a
night's lodgings: and so he fell asleep.
He had not taken above half of his first nap,
Part I. 5
when he was awakened by the clock of the
chateau
,
in the turret over his chamber, which
struck midnight. It was just such an old clock
as ghosts are fond of. It had a deep, dismal
tone, and struck so slowly and tediously that
my uncle thought it would never have done.
He counted and counted till he was confident
he counted thirteen, and then it stopped.
The fire had burnt low, and the blaze of the
last faggot was almost expiring, burning in small
blue flames, which now and then lengthened up
into little white gleams. My uncle lay with
his eyes half closed, and his nightcap drawn
almost down to his nose. His fancy was
already
wandering, and began to mingle up the
present scene with the crater of Vesuvius, the
French opera, the Coliseum at Rome, Dolly's
chop house in London, and all the farrago of
noted places with which the brain of a traveller
is crammedin a word, he was just falling asleep.
Suddenly he was aroused by the sound of
footsteps that appeared to be slowly pacing
along the corridor. My uncle, as I have often
heard him say himself, was a man not easily
frightened; so he lay quiet, supposing that
this might be some other guest, or some servant
on his way to bed. The footsteps, however,
approached the door; the door gently opened;
whether of its own accord, or whether pushed
open, my uncle could not distinguish:a figure
all in white glided in. It was a female, tall
and stately in person, and of a most
commanding
air. Her dress was of an ancient fashion,
ample in volume and sweeping the floor. She
walked up to the fire-place without regarding
my uncle; who raised his nightcap with one
hand, and stared earnestly at her. She
remained
for some time standing by the fire, which
flashing up at intervals cast blue and white
gleams of light that enabled my uncle to
remark
her appearance minutely.
Her face was ghastly pale, and perhaps
rendered
still more so by the blueish light of the
fire. It possessed beauty, but its beauty was
saddened by care and anxiety. There was the
look of one accustomed to trouble, but of one
whom trouble could not cast down nor subdue;
for there was still the predominating air of
proud, unconquerable resolution. Such at least
was the opinion formed by my uncle, and he
considered himself a great physiognomist.
The figure remained, as I said, for some time
by the fire, putting out first one hand, then the
other, then each foot alternately, as if warming
itself; for your ghosts, if ghost it really was,
are apt to be cold. My uncle furthermore
remarked
that it wore high heeled shoes, after an
ancient fashion, with paste or diamond buckles,
that sparkled as though they were alive. At
length the figure turned gently round, casting
a glassy look about the apartment, which, as it
passed over my uncle, made his blood run cold,
and chilled the very marrow in his bones. It
then stretched its arms toward heaven, clasped
its hands, and wringing them in a supplicating
manner, glided slowly out of the room.
My uncle lay for some time meditating on
this visitation, for (as he remarked when he
told me the story) though a man of firmness, he
was also a man of reflection, and did not reject
a thing because it was out of the regular course
of events. However, being as I have before
said, a great traveller, and accustomed to strange
adventures, he drew his nightcap resolutely
over his eyes, turned his back to the door,
hoisted
the bed clothes high over his shoulders, and
gradually fell asleep.
How long he slept he could not say, when he
was awakened by the voice of some one at his bed
side. He turned round and beheld the old French
servant, with his ear locks in tight buckles on
each side of a long, lanthorn face, on which habit
had deeply wrinkled an everlasting smile. He
made a thousand grimaces and asked a thousand
pardons for disturbing Monsieur, but the morning
was considerably advanced. While my uncle
was dressing, he called vaguely to mind the
visiter
of the preceding night. He asked the ancient
domestic what lady was in the habit of rambling
about this part of the chateau at night. The old
valet shrugged his shoulders as high as his head,
laid one hand on his bosom, threw open the other
with every finger extended; made a most
whimsical
grimace, which he meant to be
complimentary
:
It was not for him to know any thing of
les
braves fortunes
of Monsieur.
My uncle saw there was nothing satisfactory
to be learnt in this quarter.After breakfast he
was walking with the Marquis through the
modern
apartments of the chateau; sliding over the
well waxed floors of silken saloons, amidst
furniture
rich in gilding and brocade; until they
came to a long picture gallery, containing many
portraits, some in oil and some in chalks.
Here was an ample field for the eloquence of
his host, who had all the family pride of a
nobleman
of the
ancien regime
. There was not a grand
name in Normandy, and hardly one in France,
that was not, in some way or other, connected
with his house. My uncle stood listening with
inward impatience, resting sometimes on one leg,
sometimes on the other, as the little Marquis
descanted, with his usual fire and vivacity, on the
achievements of his ancestors, whose portraits
hung along the wall; from the martial deeds of
the stern warriors in steel, to the gallantries and
intrigues of the blue-eyed gentlemen, with fair
smiling faces, powdered ear locks, laced ruffles,
and pink and blue silk coats and breeches; not
forgetting the conquests of the lovely
shepherdesses
,
with hoop petticoats and waists no thicker
than an hour glass, who appeared ruling over
their sheep and their swains with dainty crooks
decorated with fluttering ribbands.
In the midst of his friend's discourse my
uncle's
eye rested on a full length portrait, which
struck him as being the very counterpart of his
visiter of the preceding night.
Methinks, said he, pointing to it, I have
seen the original of this portrait.
Pardonnez moi,
replied the Marquis
politely
,
that can hardly be, as the lady has been
dead more than a hundred years. That was the
beautiful Duchess de Longneville, who figured
during the minority of Louis the Fourteenth.
And was there any thing remarkable in her
history?
Never was question more unlucky. The little
Marquis immediately threw himself into the
attitude
of a man about to tell a long story. In
fact, my uncle had pulled upon himself the whole
history of the civil war of the Fronde, in which
the beautiful Duchess had played so
distinguished
a part. Turenne, Coligni, Mazarin, were
called up from their graves to grace his
narration
;
nor were the affairs of the
Barricadoes
,
nor the chivalry of the Pertcocheres
forgotten
.
My uncle began to wish himself a
thousand
leagues off from the Marquis and his
merciless
memory, when suddenly the little man's
recollections took a more interesting turn. He
was relating the imprisonment of the Duke de
Longueville, with the Princes Cond and Conti,
in the chateau of Vincennes, and the ineffectual
efforts of the Duchess to rouse the sturdy
Normans
to their rescue. He had come to that
part where she was invested by the royal forces
in the chateau of Dieppe, and in imminent
danger of falling into their hands.
The spirit of the Duchess, proceeded the
Marquis, rose with her trials. It was
astonishing
to see so delicate and beautiful a being buffet
so resolutely with hardships. She determined
on a desperate means of escape. One dark
unruly
night, she issued secretly out of a small
postern gate of the castle, which the enemy had
neglected to guard. She was followed by her
female attendants, a few domestics, and some
gallant
cavaliers who still remained faithful to her
fortunes. Her object was to gain a small port
about two leagues distant, where she had
privately
provided a vessel for her escape in case of
emergency.
The little band of fugitives were obliged to
perform the distance on foot. When they
arrived
at the port the wind was high and stormy,
the tide contrary, the vessel anchored far off in
the road, and no means of getting on board, but
by a fishing shallop that lay tossing like a cockle
shell on the edge of the surf. The Duchess
determined to risk the attempt. The seamen
endeavoured to dissuade her, but the imminence
of her danger on shore, and the magnanimity of
Part I. 6
her spirit urged her on. She had to be borne to
the shallop in the arms of a mariner. Such was
the violence of the wind and waves, that he
faltered
,
lost his foothold, and let his precious
burthen
fall into the sea.
The Duchess was nearly drowned; but partly
through her own struggles, partly by the exertions
of the seamen, she got to land. As soon as she
had a little recovered strength, she insisted on
renewing
the attempt. The storm, however, had
by this time become so violent as to set all efforts
at defiance. To delay, was to be discovered and
taken prisoner. As the only resource left, she
procured horses; mounted with her female
attendants
en croupe
behind the gallant gentlemen
who accompanied her; and scoured the country
to seek some temporary asylum.
While the Duchess, continued the Marquis,
laying his forefinger on my uncle's breast to arouse
his flagging attention, while the Duchess, poor
lady, was wandering amid the tempest in this
disconsolate
manner, she arrived at this chateau.
Her approach caused some uneasiness; for the
clattering of a troop of horse, at dead of night, up
the avenue of a lonely chateau, in those unsettled
times, and in a troubled part of the country, was
enough to occasion alarm.
A tall, broad-shouldered chasseur, armed to
the teeth, gallopped ahead, and announced the
name of the visiter. All uneasiness was
dispelled
.
The household turned out with flambeaux
to receive her, and never did torches gleam on a
more weather-beaten, travel-stained band than
came tramping into the court. Such pale,
careworn
faces, such bedraggled dresses, as the poor
Duchess and her females presented, each seated
behind her cavalier; while half drenched, half
drowsy pages and attendants, seemed ready to
fall from their horses with sleep and fatigue.
The Duchess was received with a hearty
welcome by my ancestor. She was ushered
into
the Hall of the chateau, and the fires soon
crackled and blazed to cheer herself and her train;
and every spit and stewpan was put in requisition
to prepare ample refreshments for the wayfarers.
She had a right to our hospitalities,
continued
the little Marquis, drawing himself up
with a slight degree of stateliness, for she was
related to our family. I'll tell you how it was:
Her father, Henry de Bourbon, Prince of
Cond
But did the Duchess pass the night in the
chateau? said my uncle rather abruptly,
terrified
at the idea of getting involved in one of the
Marquis's genealogical discussions.
Oh, as to the Duchess, she was put into the
apartment you occupied last night; which, at that
time, was a kind of state apartment. Her
followers
were quartered in the chambers opening
upon the neighbouring corridor, and her favourite
page slept in an adjoining closet. Up and down
the corridor walked the great chasseur, who had
announced her arrival, and who acted as a kind
of sentinel or guard. He was a dark, stern,
powerful looking fellow, and as the light of a
lamp in the corridor fell upon his deeply marked
face and sinewy form, he seemed capable of
defending
the castle with his single arm.
It was a rough, rude night; about this time
of the year.
Apropos
now I think of it, last
night was the anniversary of her visit. I may
well remember the precise date, for it was a night
not to be forgotten by our house. There is a
singular tradition concerning it in our family.
Here the Marquis hesitated, and a cloud seemed
to gather about his bushy eyebrows. There is
a traditionthat a strange occurrence took place
that nighta strange, mysterious, inexplicable
occurrence.
Here he checked himself and paused.
Did it relate to that Lady? inquired my
uncle
,
eagerly.
It was past the hour of midnight, resumed
the Marquiswhen the whole chateau
Here he paused againmy uncle made a
movement of anxious curiosity.
Excuse me, said the Marquisa slight blush
streaking his sullen visage. There are some
circumstances connected with our family history
which I do not like to relate. That was a rude
period. A time of great crimes among great
men: for you know high blood, when it runs
wrong, will not run tamely like blood of the
canaille
poor lady!But I have a little family
pride, thatexcuse mewe will change the
subject
if you please.
My uncle's curiosity was piqued. The
pompous
and magnificent introduction had led him
to expect something wonderful in the story to
which it served as a kind of avenue. He had no
idea of being cheated out of it by a sudden fit of
unreasonable squeamishness. Besides, being a
traveller, in quest of information, he considered
it his duty to inquire into every thing.
The Marquis, however, evaded every
question
.
Well, said my uncle, a little petulantly,
whatever you may think of it, I saw that lady
last night.
The Marquis stepped back and gazed at him
with surprise.
She paid me a visit in my bed chamber.
The Marquis pulled out his snuff-box with a
shrug and a smile; taking it no doubt for an
awkward piece of English pleasantry, which
politeness required him to be charmed with.
My uncle went on gravely, however, and related
the whole circumstance. The Marquis heard
him through with profound attention, holding
his snuff-box unopened in his hand. When the
story was finished he tapped on the lid of his box
deliberately; took a long sonorous pinch of
snuff
Bah! said the Marquis, and walked toward
the other end of the gallery.
Here the narrator paused. The company
waited
for some time for him to resume his narrative;
but he continued silent.
Well, said the inquisitive gentleman, and
what did your uncle say then?
Nothing, replied the other.
And what did the Marquis say farther?
Nothing.
And is that all?
That is all, said the narrator filling a glass
of wine.
I surmise, said the shrewd old gentleman
with the waggish noseI surmise it was the
old housekeeper walking her rounds to see that
all was right.
Bah! said the narrator, my uncle was too
much accustomed to strange sights not to know
a ghost from a housekeeper!
There was a murmur round the table half of
merriment half of disappointment. I was inclined
to think the old gentleman had really an
after-part
of his story in reserve; but he sipped his
wine and said nothing more; and there was an
odd expression about his dilapidated countenance
that left me in doubt whether he were in
drollery
or earnest.
Egad, said the knowing gentleman with
the flexible nose, this story of your uncle puts
me in mind of one that used to be told of an aunt of
mine, by the mother's side; though I don't know
that it will bear a comparison; as the good lady
was not quite so prone to meet with strange
adventures
.
But at any rate, you shall have it.
Part I. 7
THE
ADVENTURE OF MY AUNT.
My
aunt was a lady of large frame, strong
mind, and great resolution; she was what might
be termed a very manly woman. My uncle was
a thin, puny little man, very meek and
acquiescent
,
and no match for my aunt. It was
observed
that he dwindled and dwindled gradually
away, from the day of his marriage. His wife's
powerful mind was too much for him; it wore
him out. My aunt, however, took all possible
care of him, had half the doctors in town to
prescribe
for him, made him take all their
prescriptions
,
willy nilly,
and dosed him with physic
enough to cure a whole hospital. All was in
vain. My uncle grew worse and worse the more
dosing and nursing he underwent, until in the
end he added another to the long list of
matrimonial
victims, who have been killed with kindness.
And was it his ghost that appeared to her?
asked the inquisitive gentleman, who had
questioned
the former story teller.
You shall hear, replied the narrator:My
aunt took on mightily for the death of her poor
dear husband! Perhaps she felt some
compunction
at having given him so much physic, and
nursed him into his grave. At any rate, she did
all that a widow could do to honour his
memory
.
She spared no expense in either the
quantity
or quality of her mourning weeds; she wore
a miniature of him about her neck, as large as a
little sun dial; and she had a full length portrait
of him always hanging in her bed chamber. All
the world extolled her conduct to the skies; and
it was determined, that a woman who behaved
so well to the memory of one husband, deserved
soon to get another.
It was not long after this that she went to
take up her residence in an old country seat in
Derbyshire, which had long been in the care of
merely a steward and housekeeper. She took
most of her servants with her, intending to make
it her principal abode. The house stood in a
lonely, wild part of the country, among the gray
Derbyshire hills; with a murderer hanging in
chains on a bleak height in full view.
The servants from town were half frightened
out of their wits, at the idea of living in such a
dismal, pagan-looking place; especially when
they got together in the servant's hall in the
evening, and compared notes on all the
hobgoblin
stories they had picked up in the course of the
day. They were afraid to venture alone about
the forlorn black-looking chambers. My ladies'
maid, who was troubled with nerves, declared she
could never sleep alone in such a gashly,
rummaging
old building; and the footman, who was
a kind-hearted young fellow, did all in his power
to cheer her up.
My aunt, herself, seemed to be struck with the
lonely appearance of the house. Before she
went to bed, therefore, she examined well the
fastenings of the doors and windows, locked up
the plate with her own hands, and carried the
keys, together with a little box of money and
jewels, to her own room; for she was a notable
woman, and always saw to all things herself.
Having put the keys under her pillow, and
dismissed
her maid, she sat by her toilet arranging
her hair; for, being, in spite of her grief for my
uncle, rather a buxom widow, she was a little
particular about her person. She sat for a little
while looking at her face in the glass, first on one
side, then on the other, as ladies are apt to do,
when they would ascertain if they have been in
good looks; for a roystering country squire of
the neighbourhood, with whom she had flirted
when a girl, had called that day to welcome her
to the country.
All of a sudden she thought she heard
something
move behind her. She looked hastily
round, but there was nothing to be seen.
Nothing
but the grimly painted portrait of her poor
dear man, which had been hung against the wall.
She gave a heavy sigh to his memory, as she was
accustomed to do, whenever she spoke of him in
company; and went on adjusting her night dress.
Her sigh was re-echoed; or answered by a
longdrawn
breath. She looked round again, but no
one was to be seen. She ascribed these sounds
to the wind, oozing through the rat holes of the
old mansion; and proceeded leisurely to put her
hair in papers, when, all at once, she thought she
perceived one of the eyes of the portrait move.
The back of her head being towards it!
said the story teller with the ruined head,
giving
a knowing wink on the sound side of his
visagegood!
Yes sir! replied drily the narrator, her
back being towards the portrait, but her eye
fixed on its reflection in the glass.
Well, as I was saying, she perceived one of
the eyes of the portrait move. So strange a
circumstance, as you may well suppose, gave
her a sudden shock. To assure herself
cautiously
of the fact, she put one hand to her forehead,
as if rubbing it; peeped through her fingers, and
moved the candle with the other hand. The
light of the taper gleamed on the eye, and was
reflected
from it. She was sure it moved. Nay,
more, it seemed to give her a wink, as she had
sometimes known her husband to do when
living! It struck a momentary chill to her heart;
for she was a lone woman, and felt herself
fearfully
situated.
The chill was but transient. My aunt, who
was almost as resolute a personage as your uncle,
sir, (turning to the old story teller,) became
instantly calm and collected. She went on
adjusting
her dress. She even hummed a favourite
air, and did not make a single false note. She
casually overturned a dressing box; took a
candle
and picked up the articles leisurely, one by
one, from the floor; pursued a rolling pin cushion
that was making the best of its way under the
bed; then opened the door; looked for an instant
into the corridor, as if in doubt whether to go;
and then walked quietly out.
She hastened down stairs, ordered the
servants
to arm themselves with the first weapons
that came to hand, placed herself at their head,
and returned almost immediately.
Her hastily levied army presented a
formidable
force. The steward had a rusty
blunder-buss
;
the coachman a loaded whip; the
footman
a pair of horse pistols; the cook a huge
chopping knife, and the butler a bottle in each
hand. My aunt led the van with a red hot
poker
;
and, in my opinion, she was the most
formidable
of the party. The waiting maid brought
up the rear, dreading to stay alone in the
servant's
hall, smelling to a broken bottle of
volatile
salts, and expressing her terror of the
ghosteses
.
Ghosts! said my aunt resolutely, I'll singe
their whiskers for them!
They entered the chamber. All was still and
undisturbed as when she left it. They
approached
the portrait of my uncle.
Pull me down that picture! cried my aunt.
A heavy groan, and a sound like the
chattering
of teeth, was heard from the portrait. The
servants shrunk back. The maid uttered a faint
shriek, and clung to the footman.
Instantly! added my aunt, with a stamp of
the foot.
The picture was pulled down, and from a
recess behind it, in which had formerly stood a
clock, they hauled forth a round-shouldered,
black-bearded varlet, with a knife as long as my
arm, but trembling all over like an aspen leaf.
Well, and who was he? No ghost, I
suppose
!
said the inquisitive gentleman.
A knight of the post, replied the narrator,
who had been smitten with the worth of the
wealthy widow; or rather a marauding Tarquin,
who had stolen into her chamber to violate her
purse and rifle her strong box when all the house
should be asleep. In plain terms, continued he,
the vagabond was a loose idle fellow of the
neighbourhood, who had once been a servant in
the house, and had been employed to assist in
arranging
it for the reception of its mistress. He
confessed that he had contrived this hiding place
for his nefarious purposes, and had borrowed an
eye from the portrait by way of a reconnoitering
hole.
And what did they do with himdid they
hang him? resumed the questioner.
Hang him?how could they? exclaimed
Part I. 8
a beetle-browed barrister, with a hawk's nose
the offence was not capitalno robbery, nor
assault had been committedno forcible entry
or breaking into the premises
My aunt, said the narrator, was a woman
of spirit, and apt to take the law into her own
hands. She had her own notions of cleanliness
also. She ordered the fellow to be drawn through
the horsepond to cleanse away all offences, and
then to be well rubbed down with an oaken
towel.
And what became of him afterwards? said
the inquisitive gentleman.
I do not exactly knowI believe he was
sent on a voyage of improvement to Botany Bay.
And your auntsaid the inquisitive
gentleman
I'll
warrant she took care to make her
maid sleep in the room with her after that.
No, sir, she did bettershe gave her hand
shortly after to the roystering squire; for she
used to observe it was a dismal thing for a
woman
to sleep alone in the country.
She was right, observed the inquisitive
gentleman
,
nodding his head sagaciouslybut I
am sorry they did not hang that fellow.
It was agreed on all hands that the last
narrator
had brought his tale to the most satisfactory
conclusion; though a country clergyman present
regretted that the uncle and aunt, who figured in
the different stories, had not been married
together
.
They certainly would have been well
matched.
But I don't see, after all, said the inquisitive
gentleman, that there was any ghost in this
last story.
Oh, if it's ghosts you want, honey, cried
the Irish captain of dragoons, if it's ghosts you
want, you shall have a whole regiment of them.
And since these gentlemen have been giving the
adventures of their uncles and aunts, faith and
I'll e'en give you a chapter too, out of my own
family history.
THE BOLD DRAGOON,
OR THE ADVENTURE OF MY GRANDFATHER.
My
grandfather was a bold dragoon, for it's a
profession, d'ye see, that has run in the family.
All my forefathers have been dragoons and died
upon the field of honour except myself, and I
hope my posterity may be able to say the same;
however, I don't mean to be vainglorious. Well,
my grandfather, as I said, was a bold dragoon,
and had served in the Low Countries. In fact,
he was one of that very army, which, according
to my uncle Toby, swore so terribly in
Flanders
.
He could swear a good stick himself; and,
moreover, was the very man that introduced the
doctrine Corporal Trim mentions, of radical heat
and radical moisture; or in other words, the mode
of keeping out the damps of ditch water by burnt
brandy. Be that as it may, it's nothing to the
purport of my story. I only tell it to show you
that my grandfather was a man not easily to be
humbugged. He had seen service; or, according
to his own phrase, he had seen the divil
and that's saying every thing.
Well, gentlemen, my grandfather was on his
way to England, for which he intended to
embark
at Ostend;bad luck to the place for one
where I was kept by storms and head winds for
three long days, and the divil of a jolly
companion
or pretty face to comfort me. Well, as I
was saying, my grandfather was on his way to
England, or rather to Ostendno matter which,
it's all the same. So one evening, towards
nightfall
,
he rode jollily into Bruges. Very like you
all know Bruges, gentlemen, a queer,
old-fashioned
Flemish town, once they say a great
place for trade and money making, in old times,
when the Mynheers were in their glory; but
almost as large and as empty as an Irishman's
pocket at the present day. Well, gentlemen,
it was the time of the annual fair. All Bruges
was crowded; and the canals swarmed with
Dutch boats, and the streets swarmed with Dutch
merchants; and there was hardly any getting
along for goods, wares, and merchandises, and
peasants in big breeches, and women in half a
score of petticoats.
My grandfather rode jollily along, in his easy
slashing way, for he was a saucy, sunshiny
fellow
staring
about him at the motley crowd, and
the old houses with gabel ends to the street and
storks' nests on the chimneys; winking at the
ya vrouws who showed their faces at the windows,
and joking the women right and left in the street;
all of whom laughed and took it in amazing good
part; for though he did not know a word of their
language, yet he had always a knack of making
himself understood among the women.
Well, gentlemen, it being the time of the
annual
fair, all the town was crowded; every inn
and tavern full, and my grandfather applied in
vain from one to the other for admittance. At
length he rode up to an old rackety inn that
looked
ready to fall to pieces, and which all the rats
would have run away from, if they could have
found room in any other house to put their heads.
It was just such a queer building as you see in
Dutch pictures, with a tall roof that reached up
into the clouds; and as many garrets, one over
the other, as the seven heavens of Mahomet.
Nothing had saved it from tumbling down but a
stork's nest on the chimney, which always brings
good luck to a house in the Low Countries; and
at the very time of my grandfather's arrival,
there were two of these long-legged birds of
grace, standing like ghosts on the chimney top.
Faith, but they've kept the house on its legs to
this very day; for you may see it any time you
pass through Bruges, as it stands there yet; only
it is turned into a brewerya brewery of strong
Flemish beer; at least it was so when I came
that way after the battle of Waterloo.
My grandfather eyed the house curiously as
he approached. It might not altogether have
struck his fancy, had he not seen in large letters
over the door,
HEER VERKOOPT MAN GOEDEN DRANK.
My grandfather had learnt enough of the
language
to know that the sign promised good
liquor
.
This is the house for me, said he,
stopping
short before the door.
The sudden appearance of a dashing dragoon
was an event in an old inn, frequented only by
the peaceful sons of traffick. A rich burgher of
Antwerp, a stately ample man, in a broad
Flemish
hat, and who was the great man and great
patron of the establishment, sat smoking a clean
long pipe on one side of the door; a fat little
distiller
of Geneva from Schiedam, sat smoking on
the other, and the bottle-nosed host stood in the
door, and the comely hostess, in crimped cap,
beside him; and the hostess' daughter, a plump
Flanders lass, with long gold pendants in her
ears, was at a side window.
Humph! said the rich burgher of Antwerp,
with a sulky glance at the stranger.
Der duyvel! said the fat little distiller of
Schiedam.
The landlord saw with the quick glance of a
publican that the new guest was not at all, at all,
to the taste of the old ones; and to tell the truth,
he did not himself like my grandfather's saucy
eye. He shook his headNot a garret in the
house but was full.
Not a garret! echoed the landlady.
Not a garret! echoed the daughter.
The burgher of Antwerp and the little
distiller
of Schiedam continued to smoke their pipes
sullenly, eyed the enemy askance from under
their broad hats, but said nothing.
My grandfather was not a man to be
browbeaten
.
He threw the reins on his horse's neck,
cocked his hat on one side, stuck one arm
akimbo
,
slapped his broad thigh with the other hand
Faith and troth! said he, but I'll sleep
in this house this very night!
My grandfather had on a tight pair of
buckskins
the
slap went to the landlady's heart.
He followed up the vow by jumping off his
horse, and making his way past the staring
Mynheers
into the public room.May be you've
been in the bar room of an old Flemish inn
faith, but a handsome chamber it was as you'd
wish to see; with a brick floor, a great fire
place, with the whole bible history in glazed
Part I. 9
tiles; and then the mantle-piece, pitching itself
head foremost out of the wall, with a whole
regiment
of cracked tea-pots and earthen jugs paraded
on it; not to mention half a dozen great Delft
platters hung about the room by way of pictures;
and the little bar in one corner, and the bouncing
bar maid inside of it with a red calico cap and
yellow ear drops.
My grandfather snapped his fingers over his
head, as he cast an eye round the room: Faith,
this is the very house I've been looking after,
said he.
There was some farther show of resistance on
the part of the garrison, but my grandfather was
an old soldier, and an Irishman to boot, and not
easily repulsed, especially after he had got into
the fortress. So he blarney'd the landlord,
kissed
the landlord's wife, tickled the landlord's
daughter, chucked the bar maid under the chin;
and it was agreed on all hands that it would be
a thousand pities, and a burning shame into the
bargain, to turn such a bold dragoon into the
streets. So they laid their heads together, that
is to say, my grandfather and the landlady, and
it was at length agreed to accommodate him with
an old chamber that had for some time been
shut up.
Some say it's haunted! whispered the
landlord's
daughter, but you're a bold dragoon, and
I dare say don't fear ghosts.
The divil a bit! said my grandfather,
pinching
her plump cheek; but if I should be
troubled
by ghosts, I've been to the Red sea in my
time, and have a pleasant way of laying them,
my darling!
And then he whispered something to the girl
which made her laugh, and give him a
good-humoured
box on the ear. In short, there was
nobody
knew better how to make his way among
the petticoats than my grandfather.
In a little while, as was his usual way, he took
complete possession of the house; swaggering all
over it:into the stable to look after his horse;
into the kitchen to look after his supper. He
had something to say or do with every one;
smoked with the Dutchmen; drank with the
Germans; slapped the men on the shoulders,
tickled the women under the ribs:never since
the days of Ally Croaker had such a rattling blade
been seen. The landlord stared at him with
astonishment
;
the landlord's daughter hung her
head and giggled whenever he came near; and
as he turned his back and swaggered along, his
tight jacket setting off his broad shoulders and
plump buckskins, and his long sword trailing by
his side, the maids whispered to one another
What a proper man!
At supper my grandfather took command of
the table d'hte as though he had been at home;
helped every body, not forgetting himself;
talked
with every one, whether he understood their
language or not; and made his way into the
intimacy
of the rich burgher of Antwerp, who had
never been known to be sociable with any one
during his life. In fact, he revolutionized the
whole establishment, and gave it such a rouse,
that the very house reeled with it. He outsat
every one at table excepting the little fat distiller
of Schiedam, who had sat soaking for a long time
before he broke forth; but when he did, he was
a very devil incarnate. He took a violent
affection
for my grandfather; so they sat drinking,
and smoking, and telling stories, and singing
Dutch and Irish songs, without understanding a
a word each other said, until the little Hollander
was fairly swampt with his own gin and water,
and carried off to bed, whooping and hiccuping,
and trolling the burthen of a Low Dutch love
song.
Well, gentlemen, my grandfather was shown
to his quarters, up a huge staircase composed of
loads of hewn timber; and through long
rigmarole
passages, hung with blackened paintings of
fruit, and fish, and game, and country frolicks, and
huge kitchens, and portly burgomasters, such as
you see about old-fashioned Flemish inns, till at
length he arrived at his room.
An old-times chamber it was, sure enough,
and crowded with all kinds of trumpery. It
looked like an infirmary for decayed and
superannuated
furniture; where every thing diseased
and disabled was sent to nurse, or to be
forgotten
.
Or rather, it might have been taken for a
general congress of old legitimate moveables,
where every kind and country had a
representative
.
No two chairs were alike: such high
backs and low backs, and leather bottoms and
worsted bottoms, and straw bottoms, and no
bottoms; and cracked marble tables with
curiously
carved legs, holding balls in their claws,
as though they were going to play at ninepins.
My grandfather made a bow to the motley
assemblage as he entered, and having undressed
himself, placed his light in the fire place, asking
pardon of the tongs, which seemed to be making
love to the shovel in the chimney corner, and
whispering soft nonsense in its ear.
The rest of the guests were by this time sound
asleep; for your Mynheers are huge sleepers.
The house maids, one by one, crept up yawning
to their atticks, and not a female head in the inn
was laid on a pillow that night without
dreaming
of the Bold Dragoon.
My grandfather, for his part, got into bed, and
drew over him one of those great bags of down,
under which they smother a man in the Low
Countries; and there he lay, melting between
two feather beds, like an anchovy sandwich
between two slices of toast and butter. He was
a warm complexioned man, and this smothering
played the very deuce with him. So, sure
enough, in a little while it seemed as if a legion
of imps were twitching at him, and all the blood
in his veins was in fever heat.
He lay still, however, until all the house was
quiet, excepting the snoring of the Mynheers
from the different chambers; who answered
one another in all kinds of tones and cadences,
like so many bull-frogs in a swamp. The quieter
the house became, the more unquiet became my
grandfather. He waxed warmer and warmer,
until at length the bed became too hot to hold
him.
May be the maid had warmed it too much?
said the curious gentleman inquiringly.
I rather think the contrary, replied the
Irishman. But be that as it may, it grew too
hot for my grandfather.
Faith there's no standing this any longer,
says he; so he jumped out of bed and went
strolling
about the house.
What for? said the inquisitive gentleman.
Why, to cool himself to be sure, replied
the other, or perhaps to find a more
comfortable
bedor perhapsbut no matter what he
went forhe never mentioned; and there's no
use in taking up our time in conjecturing.
Well, my grandfather had been for some
time absent from his room, and was returning,
perfectly cool, when just as he reached the door
he heared a strange noise within. He paused
and listened. It seemed as if some one was
trying
to hum a tune in defiance of the asthma.
He recollected the report of the room's being
haunted; but he was no believer in ghosts. So
he pushed the door gently ajar, and peeped in.
Egad, gentlemen, there was a gambol
carrying
on within enough to have astonished St.
Anthony.
By the light of the fire he saw a pale
weazen-faced
fellow in a long flannel gown and a tall
white nightcap with a tassel to it, who sat by
the fire, with a bellows under his arm by way
of bagpipe, from which he forced the
asthmatical
music that had bothered my grandfather.
As he played, too, he kept twitching about with
a thousand queer contortions; nodding his head
and bobbing about his tasselled nightcap.
My grandfather thought this very odd, and
mighty presumptuous, and was about to demand
what business he had to play his wind
instruments
in another gentleman's quarters, when a
new cause of astonishment met his eye. From the
opposite side of the room a long-backed,
bandylegged
chair, covered with leather, and studded
all over in a coxcomical fashion with little brass
nails, got suddenly into motion; thrust out first
a claw foot, then a crooked arm, and at length,
making a leg, slided gracefully up to an easy
chair, of tarnished brocade, with a hole in its
bottom, and led it gallantly out in a ghostly
minuet about the floor.
The musician now played fiercer and fiercer,
Part I. 10
and bobbed his head and his nightcap about like
mad. By degrees the dancing mania seemed to
seize upon all the other pieces of furniture. The
antique, long-bodied chairs paired off in couples
and led down a country dance; a three-legged
stool danced a hornpipe, though horribly
puzzled
by its supernumerary leg; while the
amorous
tongs seized the shovel round the waist,
and whirled it about the room in a German
waltz. In short, all the moveables got in
motion
,
capering about; pirouetting, hands across,
right and left, like so many devils, all except a
great clothes press, which kept curtseying and
curtseying, like a dowager, in one corner, in
exquisite
time to the music;being either too
corpulent
to dance, or perhaps at a loss for a
partner
.
My grandfather concluded the latter to be the
reason; so, being, like a true Irishman, devoted
to the sex, and at all times ready for a frolick,
he bounced into the room, calling to the musician
to strike up Paddy O'Rafferty, capered up to
the clothes press and seized upon two handles to
lead her out:When, whizz!the whole revel
was at an end. The chairs, tables, tongs, and
shovel slunk in an instant as quietly into their
places as if nothing had happened; and the
musician
vanished up the chimney, leaving the
bellows
behind him in his hurry. My grandfather
found himself seated in the middle of the floor,
with the clothes press sprawling before him, and
the two handles jerked off and in his hands.
Then after all, this was a mere dream! said
the inquisitive gentleman.
The divil a bit of a dream! replied the
Irishman: there never was a truer fact in this
world. Faith, I should have liked to see any
man tell my grandfather it was a dream.
Well, gentlemen, as the clothes press was a
mighty heavy body, and my grandfather likewise,
particularly in rear, you may easily suppose two
such heavy bodies coming to the ground would
make a bit of a noise. Faith, the old mansion shook
as though it had mistaken it for an earthquake.
The whole garrison was alarmed. The landlord,
who slept just below, hurried up with a candle
to inquire the cause, but with all his haste his
daughter had hurried to the scene of uproar before
him. The landlord was followed by the
landlady
,
who was followed by the bouncing bar maid,
who was followed by the simpering chambermaids
all holding together, as well as they could, such
garments as they had first lain hands on; but all
in a terrible hurry to see what the devil was to
pay in the chamber of the bold dragoon.
My grandfather related the marvellous scene
he had witnessed, and the prostrate clothes press,
and the broken handles, bore testimony to the
fact. There was no contesting such evidence;
particularly with a lad of my grandfather's
complexion
,
who seemed able to make good every
word either with sword or shillelah. So the
landlord scratched his head and looked silly, as
he was apt to do when puzzled. The landlady
scratchedno, she did not scratch her head,
but she knit her brow, and did not seem half
pleased with the explanation. But the landlady's
daughter corroborated it, by recollecting that the
last person who had dwelt in that chamber was
a famous juggler who had died of St. Vitus's
dance, and no doubt had infected all the
furniture
.
This set all things to rights, particularly when
the chambermaids declared that they had all
witnessed strange carryings on in that room;
and as they declared this upon their honours,
there could not remain a doubt upon the subject.
And did your grandfather go to bed again in
that room? said the inquisitive gentleman.
That's more than I can tell. Where he
passed the rest of the night was a secret he never
disclosed. In fact, though he had seen much
service, he was but indifferently acquainted with
geography, and apt to make blunders in his
travels
about inns at night, that it would have
puzzled
him sadly to account for in the morning.
Was he ever apt to walk in his sleep? said
the knowing old gentleman.
Never that I heard of.
THE ADVENTURE
OF
THE MYSTERIOUS PICTURE.
As one story of the kind produces another, and
as all the company seemed fully engrossed by
the topic, and disposed to bring their relatives
and ancestors upon the scene, there is no
knowing
how many more ghost adventures we might
have heard, had not a corpulent old fox-hunter,
who had slept soundly through the whole, now
suddenly awakened, with a loud and long-drawn
yawn. The sound broke the charm; the ghosts
took to flight as though it had been
cock-crowing
,
and there was a universal move for bed.
And now for the haunted chamber, said the
Irish captain, taking his candle.
Aye, who's to be the hero of the night?
said the gentleman with the ruined head.
That we shall see in the morning, said the
old gentleman with the nose: whoever looks
pale and grizzly will have seen the ghost.
Well, gentlemen, said the Baronet, there's
many a true thing said in jest. In fact, one of
you will sleep in a room to-night
Whata haunted room? a haunted room?
I claim the adventureand Iand Iand I,
cried a dozen guests, talking and laughing at the
same time.
Nono, said mine host, there is a
secret about one of my rooms on which I feel
disposed to try an experiment. So gentlemen
none of you shall know who has the haunted
chamber, until circumstances reveal it. I will
not even know it myself, but will leave it to
chance and the allotment of the housekeeper.
At the same time, if it will be any satisfaction to
you, I will observe, for the honour of my
paternal
mansion, that there's scarcely a chamber in
it but is well worthy of being haunted.
We now separated for the night, and each went
to his allotted room. Mine was in one wing of
the building, and I could not but smile at its
resemblance
in style to those eventful apartments
described in the tales of the supper table. It was
spacious and gloomy, decorated with lamp black
portraits, a bed of ancient damask, with a tester
sufficiently lofty to grace a couch of state, and a
number of massive pieces of old-fashioned
furniture
.
I drew a great claw-footed arm chair
before
the wide fire place; stirred up the fire; sat
looking into it, and musing upon the odd stories
I had heard; until, partly overcome by the
fatigue
of the day's hunting, and partly by the wine
and wassail of mine host, I fell asleep in my
chair.
The uneasiness of my position made my
slumber
troubled, and laid me at the mercy of all
kinds of wild and fearful dreams; now it was
that my perfidious dinner and supper rose in
rebellion
against my peace. I was hag-ridden by
a fat saddle of mutton; a plum pudding weighed
like lead upon my conscience; the merry thought
of a capon filled me with horrible suggestions;
and a devilled leg of a turkey stalked in all
kinds of diabolical shapes through my
imagination
.
In short, I had a violent fit of the
nightmare
.
Some strange indefinite evil seemed
hanging
over me that I could not avert; something
terrible and loathsome oppressed me that I could
not shake off. I was conscious of being asleep,
and strove to rouse myself, but every effort
redoubled the evil; until gasping, struggling,
almost strangling, I suddenly sprang bolt upright
in my chair, and awoke.
The light on the mantel piece had burnt low,
and the wick was divided; there was a great
winding sheet made by the dripping wax, on the
side towards me. The disordered taper emitted
a broad flaring flame, and threw a strong light on
a painting over the fire place, which I had not
hitherto observed.
It consisted merely of a head, or rather a face,
that appeared to be staring full upon me, and
with an expression that was startling. It was
without a frame, and at the first glance I could
hardly persuade myself that it was not a real
face, thrusting itself out of the dark oaken
pannel
.
I sat in my chair gazing at it, and the more
Part I. 11
I gazed the more it disquieted me. I had never
before been affected in the same way by any
painting. The emotions it caused were strange
and indefinite. They were something like what
I have heard ascribed to the eyes of the basilisk; or
like that mysterious influence in reptiles termed
fascination. I passed my hand over my eyes
several times, as if seeking instinctively to brush
away this allusionin vainthey instantly
reverted
to the picture, and its chilling, creeping
influence over my flesh was redoubled.
I looked round the room on other pictures,
either to divert my attention, or to see whether
the same effect would be produced by them.
Some of them were grim enough to produce the
effect, if the mere grimness of the painting
produced
itno such thing. My eye passed over
them all with perfect indifference, but the
moment
it reverted to this visage over the fire place,
it was as if an electric shock darted through me.
The other pictures were dim and faded; but this
one protruded from a plain black ground in the
strongest relief, and with wonderful truth of
colouring
.
The expression was that of agony
the agony of intense bodily pain; but a menace
scowled upon the brow, and a few sprinklings
of blood added to its ghastliness. Yet it was not
all these characteristicsit was some horror of
the mind, some inscrutable antipathy awakened
by this picture, which harrowed up my feelings.
I tried to persuade myself that this was
chimerical
;
that my brain was confused by the
fumes of mine host's good cheer, and, in some
measure, by the odd stories about paintings which
had been told at supper. I determined to shake
off these vapours of the mind; rose from my
chair, and walked about the room; snapped my
fingers; rallied myself; laughed aloud. It was
a forced laugh, and the echo of it in the old
chamber
jarred upon my ear. I walked to the
window
;
tried to discern the landscape through the
glass. It was pitch darkness, and howling storm
without; and as I heard the wind moan among
the trees, I caught a reflection of this accursed
visage in the pane of glass, as though it were
staring through the window at me. Even the
reflection of it was thrilling.
How was this vile nervous fit, for such I now
persuaded myself it was, to be conquered? I
determined to force myself not to look at the
painting, but to undress quickly and get into
bed. I began to undress, but in spite of every
effort I could not keep myself from stealing a
glance every now and then at the picture; and
a glance was now sufficient to distress me.
Even when my back was turned to it, the idea
of this strange face behind me, peering over my
shoulder, was insufferable. I threw off my
clothes and hurried into bed; but still this
visage
gazed upon me. I had a full view of it
from my bed, and for some time could not take
my eyes from it. I had grown nervous to a
dismal
degree.
I put out the light, and tried to force myself
to sleep;all in vain! The fire gleaming up a
little, threw an uncertain light about the room,
leaving, however, the region of the picture in
deep shadow. What, thought I, if this be the
chamber about which mine host spoke as having
a mystery reigning over it?I had taken his
words merely as spoken in jest; might they have
a real import? I looked around. The faintly
lighted apartment had all the qualifications
requisite
for a haunted chamber. It began in my
infected imagination to assume strange
appearances
.
The old portraits turned paler and paler,
and blacker and blacker; the streaks of light and
shadow thrown among the quaint old articles of
furniture, gave them singular shapes and
characters
.
There was a huge dark clothes press of
antique form, gorgeous in brass and lustrous with
wax, that began to grow oppressive to me.
Am I then, thought I, indeed, the hero of the
haunted room? Is there really a spell laid upon
me, or is this all some contrivance of mine host,
to raise a laugh at my expense? The idea of
being hag-ridden by my own fancy all night, and
then bantered on my haggard looks the next day
was intolerable; but the very idea was sufficient
to produce the effect, and to render me still more
nervous. Pish, said I, it can be no such thing.
How could my worthy host imagine that I, or
any man would be so worried by a mere picture?
It is my own diseased imagination that torments
me. I turned in my bed, and shifted from side
to side, to try to fall asleep; but all in vain.
When one cannot get asleep by lying quiet, it is
seldom that tossing about will effect the purpose.
The fire gradually went out and left the room in
darkness. Still I had the idea of this
inexplicable
countenance gazing and keeping watch
upon me through the darkness. Nay, what was
worse, the very darkness seemed to give it
additional
power, and to multiply its terrors. It was
like having an unseen enemy hovering about one
in the night. Instead of having one picture now
to worry me, I had a hundred. I fancied it in
every direction. And there it is, thought I,and
there, and there,with its horrible and mysterious
expression, still gazing and gazing on me. No
if I must suffer this strange and dismal influence,
it were better face a single foe, than thus be
haunted by a thousand images of it.
Whoever has been in such a state of nervous
agitation, must know that the longer it continues,
the more uncontroulable it grows; the very air
of the chamber seemed at length infected by the
baleful presence of this picture. I fancied it
hovering
over me. I almost felt the fearful visage
from the wall approaching my face,it seemed
breathing upon me. This is not to be borne, said
I, at length, springing out of bed. I can stand
this no longer. I shall only tumble and toss
about here all night; make a very spectre of
myself
,
and become the hero of the haunted
chamber
in good earnest. Whatever be the
consequence
,
I'll quit this cursed room, and seek a
night's rest elsewhere. They can but laugh at
me at all events, and they'll be sure to have the
laugh upon me if I pass a sleepless night and
show them a haggard and wo-begone visage in
the morning.
All this was half muttered to myself, as I
hastily
slipped on my clothes; which having done,
I groped my way out of the room, and down stairs
to the drawing room. Here, after tumbling over
two or three pieces of furniture, I made out to
reach a sopha, and stretching myself upon it
determined
to bivonack there for the night.
The moment I found myself out of the
neighbourhood
of that strange picture, it seemed as if
the charm were broken. All its influence was at
an end. I felt assured that it was confined to its
own dreary chamber, for I had, with a sort of
instinctive caution, turned the key when I closed
the door. I soon calmed down, therefore, into
a state of tranquillity; from that into a
drowsiness
,
and finally into a deep sleep; out of which
I did not awake, until the housemaid, with her
besom and her matin song, came to put the room
in order. She stared at finding me stretched
upon the sofa; but I presume circumstances of
the kind were not uncommon after hunting
dinners
,
in her master's bachelor establishment; for
she went on with her song and her work, and took
no farther heed of me.
I had an unconquerable repugnance to return
to my chamber; so I found my way to the
butler's
quarters, made my toilette in the best way
circumstances would permit, and was among the
first to appear at the breakfast table. Our
breakfast
was a substantial fox-hunter's repast, and the
company were generally assembled at it. When
ample justice had been done to the tea, coffee,
cold meats, and humming ale, for all these were
furnished in abundance, according to the tastes
of the different guests, the conversation began to
break out, with all the liveliness and freshness of
morning mirth.
But who is the hero of the haunted
chamber
?Who
has seen the ghost last night? said
the inquisitive gentleman, rolling his lobster eyes
about the table.
The question set every tongue in motion; a
vast deal of bantering; criticizing of
countenances
;
of mutual accusation and retort took place.
Some had drunk deep, and some were unshaven,
so that there were suspicious faces enough in the
assembly. I alone could not enter with ease and
vivacity into the joke. I felt tongue-tied
embarrassed
.
A recollection of what I had seen and
felt the preceding night still haunted my mind.
It seemed as if the mysterious picture still held a
Part I. 12
thrall upon me. I thought also that our host's
eye was turned on me with an air of curiosity.
In short, I was conscious that I was the hero of
the night, and felt as if every one might read it in
my looks.
The jokes, however, passed over, and no
suspicion
seemed to attach to me. I was just
congratulating
myself on my escape, when a servant
came in, saying, that the gentleman who had slept
on the sofa in the drawing room, had left his
watch under one of the pillows. My repeater
was in his hand.
What! said the inquisitive gentleman, did
any gentleman sleep on the sofa?
Soho! soho! a harea hare! cried the old
gentleman with the flexible nose.
I could not avoid acknowledging the watch,
and was rising in great confusion, when a
boisterous
old squire who sat beside me, exclaimed,
slapping me on the shoulder, 'Sblood, lad!
thou'rt the man as has seen the ghost!
The attention of the company was
immediately
turned to me; if my face had been pale the
moment before, it now glowed almost to
burning
.
I tried to laugh, but could only make a
grimace; and found all the muscles of my face
twitching at sixes and sevens, and totally out of
all controul.
It takes but little to raise a laugh among a set
of fox-hunters. There was a world of
merriment
and joking at my expense; and as I
never
relished a joke overmuch when it was at my
own expense, I began to feel a little nettled. I
tried to look cool and calm and to restrain my
pique; but the coolness and calmness of a man
in a passion are confounded treacherous.
Gentlemen, said I, with a slight cocking of the
chin, and a bad attempt at a smile, this is all very
pleasantha!ha!very pleasantbut I'd have
you know I am as little superstitious as any of you
ha! ha!and as to any thing like timidity
you may smile gentlemenbut I trust there
is no one here means to insinuate that.
As to a room's being haunted, I repeat,
gentlemen(growing a little warm at seeing
a cursed grin breaking out round me)as
to a room's being haunted, I have as little
faith in such silly stories as any one. But, since
you put the matter home to me, I will say that I
have met with something in my room strange and
inexplicable to me(a shout of laughter.)
Gentlemen
,
I am seriousI know well what I am
sayingI am calm, gentlemen, (striking my
fist upon the table)by heaven I am calm. I
am neither trifling, nor do I wish to be trifled with
(the laughter of the company suppressed with
ludicrous attempts at gravity.) There is a
picture
in the room in which I was put last night,
that has had an effect upon me the most
singular
and incomprehensible.
A picture! said the old gentleman with
the haunted head. A picture! cried the
narrator
with the waggish nose. A picture! a
picture! echoed several voices. Here there
was an ungovernable peal of laughter.
I could not contain myself. I started up from
my seatlooked round on the company with
fiery indignationthrust both my hands into my
pockets, and strode up to one of the windows,
as though I would have walked through it. I
stopped short; looked out upon the landscape
without distinguishing a feature of it; and felt
my gorge rising almost to suffocation.
Mine host saw it was time to interfere. He
had maintained an air of gravity through the whole
of the scene, and now stepped forth as if to
shelter
me from the overwhelming merriment of my
companions.
Gentlemen, said he, I dislike to spoil
sport, but you have had your laugh, and the joke
of the haunted chamber has been enjoyed. I
must now take the part of my guest. I must
not only vindicate him from your pleasantries,
but I must reconcile him to himself, for I
suspect
he is a little out of humour with his own
feelings; and above all, I must crave his pardon
for having made him the subject of a kind of
experiment
.
Yes, gentlemen, there is something strange
and peculiar in the chamber to which our friend
was shown last night. There is a picture which
possesses a singular and mysterious influence;
and with which there is connected a very
curious
story. It is a picture to which I attach a
value from a variety of circumstances; and
though I have often been tempted to destroy it,
from the odd and uncomfortable sensations it
produces in every one that beholds it; yet I have
never been able to prevail upon myself to make
the sacrifice. It is a picture I never like to look
upon myself; and which is held in awe by all
my servants. I have therefore banished it to a
room but rarely used; and should have had it
covered last night, had not the nature of our
conversation
,
and the whimsical talk about a
haunted
chamber tempted me to let it remain, by way
of experiment, whether a stranger, totally
unacquainted
with its story, would be affected by
it.
The words of the Baronet had turned every
thought into a different channel; all were
anxious
to hear the story of the mysterious picture;
and for myself, so strongly were my feelings
interested
,
that I forgot to feel piqued at the
experiment
which my host had made upon my nerves,
and joined eagerly in the general entreaty.
As the morning was stormy, and precluded
all egress, my host was glad of any means of
entertaining
his company; so drawing his arm
chair beside the fire, he began
THE ADVENTURE
OF
THE MYSTERIOUS STRANGER.
Many
years since, when I was a young man,
and had just left Oxford, I was sent on the grand
tour to finish my education. I believe my
parents
had tried in vain to inoculate me with
wisdom
;
so they sent me to mingle with society, in
hopes I might take it the natural way. Such, at
least, appears to be the reason for which
nine-tenths
of our youngsters are sent abroad.
In the course of my tour I remained some time
at Venice. The romantic character of the place
delighted me; I was very much amused by the
air of adventure and intrigue that prevailed in this
region of masks and gondolas; and I was
exceedingly
smitten by a pair of languishing black
eyes, that played upon my heart from under an
Italian mantle. So I persuaded myself that I
was lingering at Venice to study men and
manners
.
At least I persuaded my friends so, and
that answered all my purpose. Indeed, I was a
little prone to be struck by peculiarities in
character
and conduct, and my imagination was so
full of romantic associations with Italy, that I was
always on the look out for adventure.
Every thing chimed in with such a humour in
this old mermaid of a city. My suite of
apartments
were in a proud, melancholy palace on the
grand canal, formerly the residence of a
Magnifico
,
and sumptuous with the traces of decayed
grandeur. My gondolier was one of the
shrewdest
of his class, active, merry, intelligent, and,
like his brethren, secret as the grave; that is to
say, secret to all the world except his master. I
had not had him a week before he put me behind
all the curtains in Venice. I liked the silence and
mystery of the place, and when I sometimes saw
from my window a black gondola gliding
mysteriously
along in the dusk of the evening, with
nothing visible but its little glimmering lantern, I
would jump into my own zenduletto, and give a
Part I. 13
signal for pursuit. But I am running away from
my subject with the recollection of youthful
follies
,
said the Baronet, checking himself, let me
come to the point.
Among my familiar resorts was a Cassino
under
the Arcades on one side of the grand square
of St. Mark. Here I used frequently to lounge
and take my ice on those warm summer nights
when in Italy every body lives abroad until
morning
.
I was seated here one evening, when a
groupe of Italians took seat at a table on the
opposite
side of the saloon. Their conversation
was gay and animated, and carried on with
Italian
vivacity and gesticulation.
I remarked among them one young man,
however
,
who appeared to take no share, and find no
enjoyment in the conversation; though he
seemed
to force himself to attend to it. He was tall
and slender, and of extremely prepossessing
appearance
.
His features were fine, though
emaciated
.
He had a profusion of black glossy hair
that curled lightly about his head, and contrasted
with the extreme paleness of his countenance.
His brow was haggard; deep furrows seemed to
have been ploughed into his visage by care, not
by age, for he was evidently in the prime of
youth. His eye was full of expression and fire,
but wild and unsteady. He seemed to be
tormented
by some strange fancy or apprehension.
In spite of every effort to fix his attention on the
conversation of his companions, I noticed that
every now and then he would turn his head
slowly
round, give a glance over his shoulder, and
then withdraw it with a sudden jerk, as if
something
painful had met his eye. This was
repeated
at intervals of about a minute; and he
appeared
hardly to have got over one shock, before I
saw him slowly preparing to encounter another.
After sitting some time in the Cassino, the
party
paid for the refreshments they had taken, and
departed. The young man was the last to leave
the saloon, and I remarked him glancing behind
him in the same way, just as he passed out at the
door. I could not resist the impulse to rise and
follow him; for I was at an age when a
romantic
feeling of curiosity is easily awakened. The
party walked slowly down the Arcades, talking
and laughing as they went. They crossed the
Piazzetta, but paused in the middle of it to
enjoy
the scene. It was one of those moonlight
nights so brilliant and clear in the pure
atmosphere
of Italy. The moon-beams streamed
on the tall tower of St. Mark, and lighted up
the magnificent front and swelling domes of the
Cathedral. The party expressed their delight in
animated terms. I kept my eye upon the young
man. He alone seemed abstracted and
self-occupied
.
I noticed the same singular, and as it
were, furtive glance over the shoulder that had
attracted my attention in the Cassino. The
party moved on, and I followed; they passed
along the walks called the Broglio; turned the
corner of the Ducal palace, and getting into a
gondola, glided swiftly away.
The countenance and conduct of this young
man dwelt upon my mind. There was
something
in his appearance that interested me
exceedingly
.
I met him a day or two after in a
gallery of paintings. He was evidently a
connoisseur
,
for he always singled out the most
masterly
productions, and the few remarks drawn
from him by his companions showed an intimate
acquaintance with the art. His own taste,
however
,
ran on singular extremes. On Salvator
Rosa in his most savage and solitary scenes; on
Raphael, Titian and Corregio in their softest
delineations
of female beauty. On these he would
occasionally gaze with transient enthusiasm.
But this seemed only a momentary forgetfulness.
Still would recur that cautious glance behind,
and always quickly withdrawn, as though
something
terrible had met his view.
I encountered him frequently afterwards. At
the theatre, at balls, at concerts; at the
promenades
in the gardens of San Georgio; at the
grotesque exhibitions in the square of St. Mark;
among the throng of merchants on the Exchange
by the Rialto. He seemed, in fact, to seek
crowds; to hunt after bustle and amusement;
yet never to take any interest in either the
business
or gayety of the scene. Ever an air of
painful thought, of wretched abstraction; and
ever that strange and recurring movement, of
glancing fearfully over the shoulder. I did not
know at first but this might be caused by
apprehension
of arrest; or perhaps from dread of
assassination
.
But, if so, why should he go thus
continually abroad; why expose himself at all
times and in all places?
I became anxious to know this stranger.
I was drawn to him by that romantic sympathy
that sometimes draws young men towards each
other. His melancholy threw a charm about
him in my eyes, which was no doubt
heightened
by the touching expression of his
countenance
,
and the manly graces of his person; for
manly beauty has its effect even upon man. I
had an Englishman's habitual diffidence and
awkwardness of address to contend with; but
I subdued it, and from frequently meeting him
in the Cassino, gradually edged myself into his
acquaintance. I had no reserve on his part to
contend with. He seemed on the contrary to
court society; and in fact to seek any thing
rather than be alone.
When he found I really took an interest in
him he threw himself entirely upon my
friendship
.
He clung to me like a drowning man. He
would walk with me for hours up and down the
place of St. Marksor he would sit until night
was far advanced in my apartment; he took
rooms under the same roof with me; and his
constant request was, that I would permit him,
when it did not incommode me, to sit by me in
my saloon. It was not that he seemed to take a
particular delight in my conversation; but rather
that he craved the vicinity of a human being; and
above all, of a being that sympathized with him.
I have often heard, said he, of the sincerity of
Englishmenthank God I have one at length
for a friend!
Yet he never seemed disposed to avail himself
of my sympathy other than by mere
companionship
.
He never sought to unbosom himself to
me; there appeared to be a settled corroding
anguish
in his bosom that neither could be soothed
by silence nor by speaking. A devouring
melancholy
preyed upon his heart, and seemed to
be drying up the very blood in his veins. It
was not a soft melancholythe disease of the
affections; but a parching withering agony. I
could see at times that his mouth was dry and
feverish; he almost panted rather than breathed;
his eyes were bloodshot; his cheeks pale and
livid; with now and then faint streaks athwart
thembaleful gleams of the fire that was
consuming
his heart. As my arm was within his, I
felt him press it at times with a convulsive
motion
to his side; his hands would clinch
themselves
involuntarily, and a kind of shudder would
run through his frame. I reasoned with him
about his melancholy, and sought to draw from
him the causehe shrunk from all confiding.
Do not seek to know it, said he, you could
not relieve it if you knew it; you would not even
seek to relieve iton the contrary, I should lose
your sympathy; and that said he, pressing my
hand convulsively, that I feel has become too
dear to me to risk.
I endeavoured to awaken hope within him.
He was young; life had a thousand pleasures
in store for him; there is a healthy reaction in
the youthful heart; it medicines its own
woundsCome, come said I, there is no
grief so great that youth cannot outgrow it.
No!no! said he, clinching his teeth, and striking
repeatedly, with the energy of despair, upon his
bosomIt is hereheredeep rooted;
draining
my heart's blood. It grows and grows, while
my heart withers and withers! I have a
dreadful
monitor that gives me no reposethat
follows
me step by step; and will follow me step
by step, until it pushes me into my grave!
As he said this he gave involuntarily one of those
fearful glances over his shoulder, and shrunk
back with more than usual horror. I could
not resist the temptation, to allude to this
movement
,
which I supposed to be some mere
malady
of the nerves. The moment I mentioned it
his face became crimsoned and convulsedhe
grasped me by both hands: For God's sake
exclaimed
he, with a piercing agony of voice
never allude to that againlet us avoid this
subject, my friend: you cannot relieve me,
Part I. 14
indeed you cannot relieve me; but you may add
to the torments I suffer;at some future day you
shall know all.
I never resumed the subject; for however
much my curiosity might be aroused, I felt too
true a compassion for his sufferings to increase
them by my intrusion. I sought various ways
to divert his mind, and to arouse him from the
constant meditations in which he was plunged.
He saw my efforts, and seconded them as far
as in his power, for there was nothing moody or
wayward in his nature; on the contrary, there
was something frank, generous, unassuming, in
his whole deportment. All the sentiments that
he uttered were noble and lofty. He claimed
no indulgence; he asked no toleration. He
seemed content to carry his load of misery in
silence
,
and only sought to carry it by my side.
There was a mute beseeching manner about
him, as if he craved companionship as a
charitable
boon; and a tacit thankfulness in his
looks, as if he felt grateful to me for not
repulsing
him.
I felt this melancholy to be infectious. It stole
over my spirits; interfered with all my gay
pursuits
,
and gradually saddened my life; yet I could
not prevail upon myself to shake off a being who
seemed to hang upon me for support. In truth,
the generous traits of character that beamed
through all this gloom had penetrated to my heart.
His bounty was lavish and open-handed. His
charity melting and spontaneous. Not confined
to mere donations, which often humiliate as much
as they relieve. The tone of his voice, the beam
of his eye, enhanced every gift, and surprised the
poor suppliant with that rarest and sweetest of
charities, the charity not merely of the hand but
of the heart. Indeed, his liberality seemed to
have something in it of self-abasement and
expiation
.
He humbled himself, in a manner,
before
the mendicant. What right have I to ease
and affluence, would he murmur to himself,
when innocence wanders in misery and rags?
The Carnival time arrived. I had hoped that
the gay scenes which then presented themselves
might have some cheering effect. I mingled with
him in the motley throng that crowded the place
of St. Mark. We frequented operas, masquerades,
balls. All in vain. The evil kept growing on
him; he became more and more haggard and
agitated
.
Often, after we had returned from one
of these scenes of revelry, I have entered his room,
and found him lying on his face on the sofa: his
hands clinched in his fine hair, and his whole
countenance bearing traces of the convulsions of
his mind.
The Carnival passed away; the season of Lent
succeeded; Passion week arrived. We attended
one evening a solemn service in one of the
churches; in the course of which, a grand piece
of vocal and instrumental music was performed
relating to the death of our Saviour.
I had remarked that he was always
powerfully
affected by music; on this occasion he was
so in an extraordinary degree. As the pealing
notes swelled through the lofty aisles, he seemed
to kindle up with fervour. His eyes rolled
upwards
,
until nothing but the whites were visible;
his hands were clasped together, until the fingers
were deeply imprinted in the flesh. When the
music expressed the dying agony, his face
gradually
sunk upon his knees; and at the touching
words resounding through the church
Jesu
mori,
sobs burst from him uncontrouled. I had
never seen him weep before; his had always
been agony rather than sorrow. I augured well
from the circumstance. I let him weep on
uninterrupted
.
When the service was ended, we
left the church. He hung on my arm as we
walked homewards, with something of a softer
and more subdued manner; instead of that
nervous
agitation I had been accustomed to witness.
He alluded to the service we had heard.
Music
,
said he, is indeed the voice of heaven;
never before have I felt more impressed by the
story of the atonement of our Saviour. Yes, my
friend, said he, clasping his hands with a kind
of transport, I know that my Redeemer liveth.
We parted for the night. His room was not
far from mine, and I heard him for some time
busied in it. I fell asleep, but was awakened
before daylight. The young man stood by my
bed side, dressed for travelling. He held a sealed
pacquet and a large parcel in his hand, which he
laid on the table. Farewell, my friend, said
he, I am about to set forth on a long journey;
but, before I go, I leave with you these
remembrances
.
In this pacquet you will find the
particulars
of my story. When you read them, I
shall be far away; do not remember me with
aversion. You have been, indeed, a friend to me.
You have poured oil into a broken heart,but
you could not heal it.Farewelllet me kiss
your handI am unworthy to embrace you.
He sunk on his knees, seized my hand in despite
of my efforts to the contrary, and covered it with
kisses. I was so surprised by all this scene that
I had not been able to say a word.
But we shall meet again, said I, hastily, as I
saw him hurrying towards the door.
Nevernever in this world! said he
solemnly
.
He sprang once more to my bed side
seized my hand, pressed it to his heart and to
his lips, and rushed out of the room.
Here the Baronet paused. He seemed lost
in thought, and sat looking upon the floor and
drumming with his fingers on the arm of his
chair.
And did this mysterious personage return?
said the inquisitive gentleman. Never!
replied
the Baronet, with a pensive shake of the
head: I never saw him again. And pray
what has all this to do with the picture?
inquired
the old gentleman with the noseTrue!
said the questionerIs it the portrait of this
crack-brained Italian? No! said the
Baronet
,
drily, not half liking the appellation given
to his hero; but this picture was inclosed in the
parcel he left with me. The sealed pacquet
contained
its explanation. There was a request on
the outside that I would not open it until six
months had elapsed. I kept my promise, in
spite of my curiosity. I have a translation of it
by me, and had meant to read it, by way of
accounting
for the mystery of the chamber, but I
fear I have already detained the company too long.
Here there was a general wish expressed to
have the manuscript read; particularly on the
part of the inquisitive gentleman. So the worthy
Baronet drew out a fairly written manuscript, and
wiping his spectacles, read aloud the following
story:
Part I. 15
THE STORY
OF
THE YOUNG ITALIAN.
I was
born at Naples. My parents, though
of noble rank, were limited in fortune, or rather
my father was ostentatious beyond his means,
and expended so much in his palace, his
equipage
,
and his retinue, that he was continually
straightened in his pecuniary circumstances. I
was a younger son, and looked upon with
indifference
by my father, who, from a principle
of family pride, wished to leave all his property
to my elder brother.
I showed, when quite a child, an extreme
sensibility. Every thing affected me violently.
While yet an infant in my mother's arms, and
before I had learnt to talk, I could be wrought
upon to a wonderful degree of anguish or
delight
by the power of music. As I grew older
my feelings remained equally acute, and I was
easily transported into paroxysms of pleasure
or rage. It was the amusement of my relatives
and of the domestics to play upon this irritable
temperament. I was moved to tears, tickled to
laughter, provoked to fury, for the entertainment
of company, who were amused by such a
tempest
of mighty passion in a pigmy frame. They
little thought, or perhaps little heeded the
dangerous
sensibilities they were fostering. I thus
became a little creature of passion, before reason
was developed. In a short time I grew too old
to be a plaything, and then I became a torment.
The tricks and passions I had been teased into
became irksome, and I was disliked by my
teachers for the very lessons they had taught me.
My mother died; and my power as a spoiled
child was at an end. There was no longer any
necessity to humour or tolerate me, for there
was nothing to be gained by it, as I was no
favourite
of my father. I therefore experienced
the fate of a spoiled child in such situation, and
was neglected, or noticed only to be crossed and
contradicted. Such was the early treatment of
a heart, which, if I am judge of it at all, was
naturally
disposed to the extremes of tenderness
and affection.
My father, as I have already said, never liked
mein fact he never understood me; he looked
upon me as wilful and wayward, as deficient in
natural affection:it was the stateliness of his
own manner; the loftiness and grandeur of his
own look that had repelled me from his arms. I
always pictured him to myself as I had seen him
clad in his senatorial robes, rustling with pomp
and pride. The magnificence of his person had
daunted my strong imagination. I could never
approach him with the confiding affection of a
child.
My father's feelings were wrapped up in my
elder brother. He was to be the inheritor of the
family title and the family dignity, and every
thing was sacrificed to himI, as well as every
thing else. It was determined to devote me to
the church, that so my humours and myself
might be removed out of the way, either of
tasking
my father's time and trouble, or interfering
with the interests of my brother. At an early age,
therefore, before my mind had dawned upon the
world and its delights, or known any thing of it
beyond the precincts of my father's palace, I was
sent to a convent, the superior of which was my
uncle, and was confided entirely to his care.
My uncle was a man totally estranged from
the world; he had never relished, for he had
never tasted its pleasures; and he deemed rigid
self-denial as the great basis of Christian virtue.
He considered every one's temperament like his
own; or at least he made them conform to it.
His character and habits had an influence over
the fraternity of which he was superior. A more
gloomy saturnine set of beings were never
assembled
together. The convent, too, was
calculated
to awaken sad and solitary thoughts. It
was situated in a gloomy gorge of those
mountains
away south of Vesuvius. All distant views
were shut out by sterile volcanic heights. A
mountain stream raved beneath its walls, and
eagles screamed about its turrets.
I had been sent to this place at so tender an
age as soon to lose all distinct recollection of the
scenes I had left behind. As my mind
expanded
,
therefore, it formed its idea of the world
from the convent and its vicinity, and a dreary
world it appeared to me. An early tinge of
melancholy
was thus infused into my character;
and the dismal stories of the monks, about devils
and evil spirits, with which they affrighted my
young imagination, gave me a tendency to
superstition
,
which I could never effectually shake off.
They took the same delight to work upon my
ardent feelings that had been so mischievously
exercised by my father's household.
I can recollect the horrors with which they
fed my heated fancy during an eruption of
Vesuvius
.
We were distant from that volcano,
with mountains between us; but its convulsive
throes shook the solid foundations of nature.
Earthquakes threatened to topple down our
convent
towers. A lurid, baleful light hung in the
heavens at night, and showers of ashes, borne by
the wind, fell in our narrow valley. The monks
talked of the earth being honey-combed beneath
us; of streams of molten lava raging through
its veins; of caverns of sulphurous flames
roaring
in the centre, the abodes of demons and the
damned; of fiery gulfs ready to yawn beneath
our feet. All these tales were told to the
doleful
accompaniment of the mountain's thunders,
whose low bellowing made the walls of our
convent
vibrate.
One of the monks had been a painter, but
had retired from the world, and embraced
this dismal life in expiation of some crime. He
was a melancholy man, who pursued his art in
the solitude of his cell, but made it a source of
penance to him. His employment was to
portray
,
either on canvass or in waxen models, the
human face and human form, in the agonies of
death, and in all the stages of dissolution and
decay
.
The fearful mysteries of the charnel house
were unfolded in his laboursthe loathsome
banquet of the beetle and the worm.I turn
with shuddering even from the recollection of
his works. Yet, at the time, my strong but
illdirected
imagination seized with ardour upon
his instructions in his art. Any thing was a
variety
from the dry studies and monotonous duties
of the cloister. In a little while I became
expert
with my pencil, and my gloomy productions
were thought worthy of decorating some of the
altars of the chapel.
In this dismal way was a creature of feeling
and fancy brought up. Every thing genial and
amiable in my nature was repressed, and nothing
brought out but what was unprofitable and
ungracious
.
I was ardent in my temperament; quick,
mercurial, impetuous, formed to be a creature
all love and adoration; but a leaden hand was
laid on all my finer qualities. I was taught
nothing
but fear and hatred. I hated my uncle, I
hated the monks, I hated the convent in which I
was immured. I hated the world, and I almost
hated myself, for being, as I supposed, so hating
and hateful an animal.
When I had nearly attained the age of sixteen,
I was suffered, on one occasion, to accompany
one of the brethren on a mission to a distant
part of the country. We soon left behind us the
gloomy valley in which I had been pent up for
so many years, and after a short journey among
the mountains, emerged upon the voluptuous
landscape that spreads itself about the Bay of
Naples. Heavens! how transported was I, when
I stretched my gaze over a vast reach of delicious
sunny country, gay with groves and vineyards;
with Vesuvius rearing its forked summit to my
right; the blue Mediterranean to my left, with
its enchanting coast, studded with shining towns
and sumptuous villas; and Naples, my native
Naples, gleaming far, far in the distance.
Good God! was this the lovely world from
which I had been excluded! I had reached that
age when the sensibilities are in all their bloom
and freshness. Mine had been checked and
chilled
.
They now burst forth with the suddenness
of a retarded spring. My heart, hitherto
unnaturally
shrunk up, expanded into a riot of vague
but delicious emotions. The beauty of nature
intoxicated, bewildered me. The song of the
peasants; their cheerful looks; their happy
avocations
;
Part I. 16
the picturesque gayety of their dresses;
their rustic music; their dances; all broke upon
me like witchcraft. My soul responded to the
music; my heart danced in my bosom. All the
men appeared amiable, all the women lovely.
I returned to the convent, that is to say, my
body returned, but my heart and soul never
entered
there again. I could not forget this glimpse
of a beautiful and a happy world; a world so
suited to my natural character. I had felt so
happy while in it; so different a being from what
I felt myself when in the conventthat tomb of
the living. I contrasted the countenances of the
beings I had seen, full of fire and freshness and
enjoyment, with the pallid, leaden, lack-lustre
visages of the monks; the music of the dance,
with the droning chant of the chapel. I had
before found the exercises of the cloister
wearisome
;
they now became intolerable. The dull
round of duties wore away my spirit; my nerves
became irritated by the fretful tinkling of the
convent
bell; evermore dinging among the
mountain
echoes; evermore calling me from my
repose
at night, my pencil by day, to attend to some
tedious and mechanical ceremony of devotion.
I was not of a nature to meditate long,
without
putting my thoughts into action. My spirit
had been suddenly aroused, and was now all
awake within me. I watched my opportunity,
fled from the convent, and made my way on foot
to Naples. As I entered its gay and crowded
streets, and beheld the variety and stir of life
around me, the luxury of palaces, the splendour
of equipages, and the pantomimic animation of
the motley populace, I seemed as if awakened to
a world of enchantment, and solemnly vowed
that nothing should force me back to the
monotony
of the cloister.
I had to inquire my way to my father's palace,
for I had been so young on leaving it, that I
knew not its situation. I found some difficulty
in getting admitted to my father's presence, for
the domestics scarcely knew that there was such
a being as myself in existence, and my monastic
dress did not operate in my favour. Even my
father entertained no recollection of my person.
I told him my name, threw myself at his feet,
implored his forgiveness, and entreated that I
might not be sent back to the convent.
He received me with the condescension of a
patron rather than the kindness of a parent. He
listened patiently, but coldly to my tale of
monastic
grievances and disgusts, and promised to
think what else could be done for me. This
coldness blighted and drove back all the frank
affection of my nature that was ready to spring
forth at the least warmth of parental kindness.
All my early feelings towards my father revived;
I again looked up to him as the stately
magnificent
being that had daunted my childish
imagination
,
and felt as if I had no pretensions to his
sympathies. My brother engrossed all his care
and love; he inherited his nature, and carried
himself towards me with a protecting rather
than a fraternal air. It wounded my pride,
which was great. I could brook condescension
from my father, for I looked up to him with awe
as a superior being; but I could not brook
patronage
from a brother, who, I felt, was
intellectually
my inferior. The servants perceived that
I was an unwelcome intruder in the paternal
mansion, and, menial-like, they treated me with
neglect. Thus baffled at every point; my
affections
outraged wherever they would attach
themselves, I became sullen, silent and
desponding
.
My feelings driven back upon myself,
entered and preyed upon my own heart. I
remained
for some days an unwelcome guest
rather than a restored son in my father's house.
I was doomed never to be properly known there.
I was made, by wrong treatment, strange even
to myself; and they judged of me from my
strangeness.
I was startled one day at the sight of one of
the monks of my convent, gliding out of my
father's room. He saw me, but pretended not
to notice me; and this very hypocrisy made me
suspect something. I had become sore and
susceptible
in my feelings; every thing inflicted a
wound on them. In this state of mind I was
treated with marked disrespect by a pampered
minion, the favourite servant of my father. All
the pride and passion of my nature rose in an
instant, and I struck him to the earth.
My father was passing by; he stopped not to
inquire the reason, nor indeed could he read the
long course of mental sufferings which were the
real cause. He rebuked me with anger and
scorn; he summoned all the haughtiness of his
nature, and grandeur of his look, to give weight
to the contumely with which he treated me. I
felt I had not deserved itI felt that I was not
appreciatedI felt that I had that within me
which merited better treatment; my heart
swelled
against a father's injustice. I broke through
my habitual awe of him. I replied to him with
impatience; my hot spirit flushed in my cheek and
kindled in my eye, but my sensitive heart swelled
as quickly, and before I had half vented my
passion
I felt it suffocated and quenched in my tears.
My father was astonished and incensed at this
turning of the worm, and ordered me to my
chamber. I retired in silence, choaking with
contending emotions.
I had not been long there when I overheard
voices in an adjoining apartment. It was a
consultation
between my father and the monk, about
the means of getting me back quietly to the
convent
.
My resolution was taken. I had no
longer
a home nor a father. That very night I left
the paternal roof. I got on board a vessel about
making sail from the harbour, and abandoned
myself to the wide world. No matter to what
port she steered; any part of so beautiful a world
was better than my convent. No matter where
I was cast by fortune; any place would be more
a home to me than the home I had left behind.
The vessel was bound to Genoa. We arrived
there after a voyage of a few days.
As I entered the harbour, between the moles
which embrace it, and beheld the amphitheatre
of palaces and churches and splendid gardens,
rising one above another, I felt at once its title
to the appellation of Genoa the Superb. I landed
on the mole an utter stranger, without knowing
what to do, or whither to direct my steps. No
matter; I was released from the thraldom of the
convent and the humiliations of home! When I
traversed the Strada Balbi and the Strada Nuova,
those streets of palaces, and gazed at the
wonders
of architecture around me; when I
wandered
at close of day, amid a gay throng!of the
brilliant and the beautiful, through the green
alleys
of the Aqua Verdi, or among the colonnades
and terraces of the magnificent Doria Gardens;
I thought it impossible to be ever otherwise than
happy in Genoa.
A few days sufficed to show me my mistake.
My scanty purse was exhausted, and for the
first time in my life I experienced the sordid
distress
of penury. I had never known the want
of money, and had never adverted to the
possibility
of such an evil. I was ignorant of the
world and all its ways; and when first the idea
of destitution came over my mind its effect was
withering. I was wandering pensively through
the streets which no longer delighted my eyes,
when chance led my steps into the magnificent
church of the Annunciata.
A celebrated painter of the day was at that
moment superintending the placing of one of his
pictures over an altar. The proficiency which
I had acquired in his art during my residence in
the convent had made me an enthusiastic
amateur
.
I was struck, at the first glance, with
the painting. It was the face of a Madonna.
So innocent, so lovely, such a divine expression
of maternal tenderness! I lost for the moment
all recollection of myself in the enthusiasm of my
art. I clasped my hands together, and uttered
an ejaculation of delight. The painter
perceived
my emotion. He was flattered and gratified
by it. My air and manner pleased him, and he
accosted me. I felt too much the want of
friendship
to repel the advances of a stranger, and
there was something in this one so benevolent
and winning that in a moment he gained my
confidence.
I told him my story and my situation,
concealing
only my name and rank. He appeared
strongly interested by my recital; invited me to
his house, and from that time I became his
favourite
pupil. He thought he perceived in me
extraordinary
Part I. 17
talents for the art, and his
encomiums
awakened all my ardour. What a
blissful
period of my existence was it that I passed
beneath his roof. Another being seemed created
within me, or rather, all that was amiable and
excellent was drawn out. I was as recluse as
ever I had been at the convent, but how
different
was my seclusion. My time was spent in
storing my mind with lofty and poetical ideas;
in meditating on all that was striking and noble
in history or fiction; in studying and tracing
all that was sublime and beautiful in nature. I
was always a visionary imaginative being, but
now my reveries and imaginings all elevated me
to rapture.
I looked up to my master as to a benevolent
genius that had opened to me a region of
enchantment
.
I became devotedly attached to him.
He was not a native of Genoa, but had been
drawn thither by the solicitation of several of the
nobility, and had resided there but a few years,
for the completion of certain works he had
undertaken
.
His health was delicate, and he had
to confide much of the filling up of his designs
to the pencils of his scholars. He considered me
as particularly happy in delineating the human
countenance; in seizing upon characteristic,
though fleeting expressions, and fixing them
powerfully upon my canvas. I was employed
continually, therefore, in sketching faces, and
often when some particular grace or beauty or
expression was wanted in a countenance, it was
entrusted to my pencil. My benefactor was fond
of bringing me forward; and partly, perhaps,
through my actual skill, and partly by his
partial
praises, I began to be noted for the
expression
of my countenances.
Among the various works which he had
undertaken
,
was an historical piece for one of the
palaces
of Genoa, in which were to be introduced
the likenesses of several of the family. Among
these was one entrusted to my pencil. It was
that of a young girl, who as yet was in a
convent
for her education. She came out for the
purpose of sitting for the picture. I first saw
her in an apartment of one of the sumptuous
palaces
of Genoa. She stood before a casement
that looked out upon the bay: a stream of vernal
sunshine fell upon her, and shed a kind of glory
round her as it lit up the rich crimson chamber.
She was but sixteen years of ageand oh how
lovely! The scene broke upon me like a mere
vision of spring, and youth, and beauty. I could
have fallen down and worshipped her. She was
like one of those fictions of poets and painters,
when they would express the
beau ideal
that
haunts their minds with shapes of indescribable
perfection.
I was permitted to sketch her countenance in
various positions, and I fondly protracted the
study that was undoing me. The more I gazed
on her the more I became enamoured; there was
something almost painful in my intense
admiration
.
I was but nineteen years of age; shy,
diffident, and inexperienced. I was treated with
attention and encouragement, for my youth and
my enthusiasm in my art had won favour for me;
and I am inclined to think that there was
something
in my air and manner that inspired interest
and respect. Still the kindness with which I was
treated could not dispel the embarrassment into
which my own imagination threw me when in
presence of this lovely being. It elevated her
into something almost more than mortal. She
seemed too exquisite for earthly use; too delicate
and exalted for human attainment. As I sat
tracing her charms on my canvas, with my eyes
occasionally riveted on her features, I drank in
delicious poison that made me giddy. My heart
alternately gushed with tenderness, and ached
with despair. Now I became more than ever
sensible of the violent fires that had lain dormant
at the bottom of my soul. You who are born in
a more temperate climate and under a cooler sky,
have little idea of the violence of passion in our
southern bosoms.
A few days finished my task; Bianca returned
to her convent, but her image remained
indelibly
impressed upon my heart. It dwelt on my
imagination; it became my pervading idea of
beauty. It had an effect even upon my pencil;
I became noted for my felicity in depicting
female
loveliness; it was but because I multiplied
the image of Bianca. I soothed, and yet fed my
fancy, by introducing her in all the productions
of my master. I have stood with delight in one
of the chapels of the Annunciata, and heard the
crowd extol the seraphic beauty of a saint which
I had painted; I have seen them bow down in
adoration before the painting: they were bowing
before the loveliness of Bianca.
I existed in this kind of dream, I might
almost
say delirium, for upwards of a year. Such
is the tenacity of my imagination that the image
which was formed in it continued in all its power
and freshness. Indeed, I was a solitary,
meditative
being, much given to reverie, and apt to
foster
ideas which had once taken strong possession
of me. I was roused from this fond,
melancholy
,
delicious dream by the death of my worthy
benefactor. I cannot describe the pangs his
death occasioned me. It left me alone and
almost
broken hearted. He bequeathed to me his
little property; which, from the liberality of his
disposition and his expensive style of living, was
indeed but small; and he most particularly
recommended
me, in dying, to the protection of a
nobleman who had been his patron.
The latter was a man who passed for
munificent
.
He was a lover and an encourager of the
arts, and evidently wished to be thought so. He
fancied he saw in me indications of future
excellence
;
my pencil had already attracted
attention
;
he took me at once under his protection;
seeing that I was overwhelmed with grief, and
incapable
of exerting myself in the mansion of my
late benefactor, he invited me to sojourn for a
time in a villa which he possessed on the border
of the sea, in the picturesque neighbourhood of
Sestri de Ponenti.
I found at the villa the Count's only son
Filippo
:
he was nearly of my age, prepossessing
in his appearance, and fascinating in his
manners
;
he attached himself to me, and seemed to
court my good opinion. I thought there was
something
of profession in his kindness, and of caprice
in his disposition; but I had nothing else near
me to attach myself to, and my heart felt the need
of something to repose itself upon. His
education
had been neglected; he looked upon me as
his superior in mental powers and acquirements,
and tacitly acknowledged my superiority. I
felt that I was his equal in birth, and that gave
an independence to my manner, which had its
effect. The caprice and tyranny I saw
sometimes
exercised on others, over whom he had
power, were never manifested towards me. We
became intimate friends, and frequent
companions
.
Still I loved to be alone, and to
indulge
in the reveries of my own imagination,
among the beautiful scenery by which I was
surounded
.
The villa stood in the midst of ornamented
grounds, finely decorated with statues and
fountains
,
and laid out into groves and alleys and
shady bowers. It commanded a wide view of
the Mediterranean, and the picturesque
Ligurian
coast. Every thing was assembled here
that could gratify the taste or agreeably occupy
the mind. Soothed by the tranquillity of this
elegant retreat, the turbulence of my feelings
gradually subsided, and, blending with the
romantic
spell that still reigned over my
imagination
,
produced a soft voluptuous melancholy.
I had not been long under the roof of the Count,
when our solitude was enlivened by another
inhabitant
.
It was a daughter of a relation of
the Count, who had lately died in reduced
circumstances
,
bequeathing this only child to his
protection. I had heard much of her beauty from
Filippo, but my fancy had become so engrossed
by one idea of beauty as not to admit of any
other. We were in the central saloon of the
villa
when she arrived. She was still in mourning,
and approached, leaning on the Count's arm. As
they ascended the marble portico, I was struck
by the elegance of her figure and movement, by
the grace with which the
mezzaro,
the
bewitching
veil of Genoa, was folded about her slender
form. They entered. Heavens! what was my
surprise when I beheld Bianca before me. It
was herself; pale with grief; but still more
matured
in loveliness than when I had last beheld
her. The time that had elapsed had developed
Part I. 18
the graces of her person; and the sorrow
she had undergone had diffused over her
countenance
an irresistible tenderness.
She blushed and trembled at seeing me, and
tears rushed into her eyes, for she remembered
in whose company she had been accustomed to
behold me. For my part, I cannot express what
were my emotions. By degrees I overcame the
extreme shyness that had formerly paralyzed me
in her presence. We were drawn together by
sympathy of situation. We had each lost our best
friend in the world; we were each, in some
measure
,
thrown upon the kindness of others. When
I came to know her intellectually, all my ideal
picturings of her were confirmed. Her newness
to the world, her delightful susceptibility to every
thing beautiful and agreeable in nature, reminded
me of my own emotions when first I escaped
from the convent. Her rectitude of thinking
delighted my judgment; the sweetness of her
nature wrapped itself round my heart; and then
her young and tender and budding loveliness,
sent a delicious madness to my brain.
I gazed upon her with a kind of idolatry, as
something more than mortal; and I felt
humiliated
at the idea of my comparative
unworthiness
Yet she was mortal; and one of
mortality's
most susceptible and loving compounds;
for she loved me!
How first I discovered the transporting truth
I cannot recollect; I believe it stole upon me
by degrees, as a wonder past hope or belief.
We were both at such a tender and loving age;
in constant intercourse with each other;
mingling
in the same elegant pursuits; for music,
poetry and painting were our mutual delights, and
we were almost separated from society, among
lovely and romantic scenery! Is it strange that
two young hearts thus brought together should
readily twine round each other?
Oh gods! what a dreama transient dream!
of unalloyed delight then passed over my soul!
Then it was that the world around me was
indeed
a paradise, for I had womanlovely,
delicious
woman, to share it with me. How often
have I rambled over the picturesque shores of
Sestri, or climbed its wild mountains, with the
coast gemmed with villas, and the blue sea far
below me, and the slender Pharo of Genoa on
its romantic promontory in the distance; and
as I sustained the faltering steps of Bianca,
have thought there could no unhappiness enter
into so beautiful a world. Why, oh why is this
budding season of life and love so transient
why is this rosy cloud of love that sheds such a
glow over the morning of our days so prone to
brew up into the whirlwind and the storm!
I was the first to awaken from this blissful
delirium
of the affections. I had gained Bianca's
heart; what was I to do with it? I had no wealth
nor prospects to entitle me to her hand. Was I
to take advantage of her ignorance of the world,
of her confiding affection, and draw her down to
my own poverty? Was this requiting the
hospitality
of the Count?was this requiting the
love of Bianca?
Now first I began to feel that even
successful
love may have its bitterness. A corroding care
gathered about my heart. I moved about the
palace like a guilty being. I felt as if I had
abused its hospitalityas if I were a thief within
its walls. I could no longer look with
unembarrassed
mien in the countenance of the Count.
I accused myself of perfidy to him, and I thought
he read it in my looks, and began to distrust and
despise me. His manner had always been
ostentatious
and condescending, it now appeared cold
and haughty. Filippo, too, became reserved and
distant; or at least I suspected him to be so.
Heavens!was this mere coinage of my brain:
was I to become suspicious of all the world?a
poor surmising wretch; watching looks and
gestures
;
and torturing myself with
misconstructions
.
Or if truewas I to remain beneath a
roof where I was merely tolerated, and linger
there on sufferance? This is not to be
endured
!
exclaimed I, I will tear myself from
this state of self abasement; I will break through
this fascination and flyFly?whither?
from the world?for where is the world when
I leave Bianca behind me!
My spirit was naturally proud, and swelled
within me at the idea of being looked upon with
contumely. Many times I was on the point of
declaring my family and rank, and asserting my
equality, in the presence of Bianca, when I
thought her relatives assumed an air of
superiority
.
But the feeling was transient. I
considered
myself discarded and contemned by my
family
;
and had solemnly vowed never to own
relationship
to them, until they themselves should
claim it.
The struggle of my mind preyed upon my
happiness and my health. It seemed as if the
uncertainty of being loved would be less
intolerable
than thus to be assured of it, and yet not
dare to enjoy the conviction. I was no longer
the enraptured admirer of Bianca; I no longer
hung in ecstacy on the tones of her voice, nor
drank in with insatiate gaze the beauty of her
countenance. Her very smiles ceased to delight
me, for I felt culpable in having won them.
She could not but be sensible of the change
in me, and inquired the cause with her usual
frankness and simplicity. I could not evade the
inquiry, for my heart was full to aching. I told
her all the conflict of my soul; my devouring
passion, my bitter self upbraiding. Yes!
said I, I am unworthy of you. I am an
off-cast
from my familya wanderera nameless,
homeless wanderer, with nothing but poverty for
my portion, and yet I have dared to love you
have dared to aspire to your love!
My agitation moved her to tears; but she saw
nothing in my situation so hopeless as I had
depicted
it. Brought up in a convent, she knew
nothing of the world, its wants, its cares;and
indeed, what woman is a worldly casuist in
matters
of the heart!Nay, moreshe kindled into
a sweet enthusiasm when she spoke of my
fortunes
and myself. We had dwelt together on
the works of the famous masters. I had related
to her their histories; the high reputation, the
influence, the magnificence to which they had
attained;the companions of princes, the
favourites
of kings, the pride and boast of nations.
All this she applied to me. Her love saw
nothing
in their greatest productions that I was not
able to achieve; and when I saw the lovely
creature glow with fervour, and her whole
countenance
radiant with the visions of my glory,
which seemed breaking upon her, I was snatched
up for the moment into the heaven of her own
imagination.
I am dwelling too long upon this part of my
story; yet I cannot help lingering over a period
of my life, on which, with all its cares and
conflicts
,
I look back with fondness; for as yet my
soul was unstained by a crime. I do not know
what might have been the result of this struggle
between pride, delicacy, and passion, had I not
read in a Neapolitan gazette an account of the
sudden death of my brother. It was
accompanied
by an earnest inquiry for intelligence
concerning
me, and a prayer, should this notice meet
my eye, that I would hasten to Naples, to
comfort
an infirm and afflicted father.
I was naturally of an affectionate disposition;
but my brother had never been as a brother to
me; I had long considered myself as
disconnected
from him, and his death caused me but little
emotion. The thoughts of my father, infirm and
suffering, touched me, however, to the quick;
and when I thought of him, that lofty magnificent
being, now bowed down and desolate, and suing
to me for comfort, all my resentment for past
neglect
was subdued, and a glow of filial affection
was awakened within me.
The predominant feeling, however that
overpowered
all others was transport at the sudden
change in my whole fortunes. A homea name
rankwealth awaited me; and love painted
a still more rapturous prospect in the distance.
I hastened to Bianca, and threw myself at her
feet. Oh, Bianca, exclaimed I, at length I
can claim you for my own. I am no longer a
nameless adventurer, a neglected, rejected
outcast
.
Lookread, behold the tidings that
restore
me to my name and to myself!
I will not dwell on the scene that ensued.
Bianca
rejoiced in the reverse of my situation,
because
she saw it lightened my heart of a load of
care; for her own part she had loved me for
myself
,
Part I. 19
and had never doubted that my own merits
would command both fame and fortune.
I now felt all my native pride buoyant
within
me.. I no longer walked with my eyes bent
to the dust; hope elevated them to the skies; my
soul was lit up with fresh fires, and beamed from
my countenance.
I wished to impart the change in my
circumstances
to the Count; to let him know who and
what I was, and to make formal proposals for the
hand of Bianca; but the Count was absent on a
distant estate. I opened my whole soul to
Filippo
.
Now first I told him of my passion; of the
doubts and fears that had distracted me, and of
the tidings that had suddenly dispelled them. He
overwhelmed me with congratulations and with
the warmest expressions of sympathy. I
embraced
him in the fullness of my heart. I felt
compunctious
for having suspected him of coldness,
and asked him forgiveness for having ever
doubted
his friendship.
Nothing is so warm and enthusiastic as a
sudden
expansion of the heart between young men.
Filippo entered into our concerns with the most
eager interest. He was our confidant and
counsellor
.
It was determined that I should hasten at
once to Naples to re-establish myself in my
father's
affections and my paternal home, and the
moment the reconciliation was effected and my
father's consent insured, I should return and
demand
Bianca of the Count. Filippo engaged to
secure his father's acquiescence; indeed, he
undertook
to watch over our interests, and was the
channel through which we were to correspond.
My parting with Bianca was tenderdelicious
agonizing. It was in a little pavilion of the
garden which had been one of our favourite resorts.
How often and often did I return to have one more
adieuto have her look once more on me in
speechless emotionto enjoy once more the
rapturous
sight of those tears streaming down her
lovely cheeksto seize once more on that
delicate
hand, the frankly accorded pledge of love,
and cover it with tears and kisses! Heavens!
There is a delight even in the parting agony of
two lovers worth a thousand tame pleasures of
the world. I have her at this moment before my
eyesat the window of the pavilion, putting aside
the vines that clustered about the casementher
light form beaming forth in virgin whiteher
countenance all tears and smilessending a
thousand
and a thousand adieus after me, as,
hesitating
,
in a delirium of fondness and agitation, I
faltered my way down the avenue.
As the bark bore me out of the harbour of
Genoa, how eagerly my eyes stretched along the
coast of Sestri, till it discerned the villa gleaming
from among trees at the foot of the mountain.
As long as day lasted, I gazed and gazed upon it,
till it lessened and lessened to a mere white speck
in the distance; and still my intense and fixed
gaze discerned it, when all other objects of the
coast had blended into indistinct confusion, or
were lost in the evening gloom.
On arriving at Naples, I hastened to my
paternal
home. My heart yearned for the
long-withheld
blessing of a father's love. As I
entered
the proud portal of the ancestral palace, my
emotions were so great that I could not speak.
No one knew me. The servants gazed at me
with curiosity and surprise. A few years of
intellectual
elevation and development had made
a prodigious change in the poor fugitive stripling
from the convent. Still that no one should know
me in my rightful home was overpowering. I
felt like the prodigal son returned. I was a
stranger in the house of my father. I burst into
tears, and wept aloud. When I made myself
known, however, all was changed. I, who had
once been almost repulsed from its walls, and
forced to fly as an exile, was welcomed back with
acclamation, with servility. One of the servants
hastened to prepare my father for my reception;
my eagerness to receive the paternal embrace was
so great that I could not await his return; but
hurried after him.
What a spectacle met my eyes as I entered the
chamber. My father, whom I had left in the
pride of vigourous age, whose noble and majestic
bearing had so awed my young imagination, was
bowed down and withered into decrepitude. A
paralysis had ravaged his stately form, and left
it a shaking ruin. He sat propped up in his
chair, with pale relaxed visage and glassy
wandering
eye. His intellects had evidently shared
in the ravage of his frame. The servant was
endeavouring to make him comprehend the
visiter
that was at hand. I tottered up to him and
sunk at his feet. All his past coldness and
neglect
were forgotten in his present sufferings. I
remembered only that he was my parent, and
that I had deserted him. I clasped his knees;
my voice was almost stifled with convulsive
sobs. Pardonpardonoh my father! was
all that I could utter. His apprehension seemed
slowly to return to him. He gazed at me for
some moments with a vague, inquiring look; a
convulsive tremor quivered about his lips; he
feebly extended a shaking hand, laid it upon my
head, and burst into an infantine flow of tears.
From that moment he would scarcely spare
me from his sight. I appeared the only object
that his heart responded to in the world: all else
was as a blank to him. He had almost lost the
powers of speech, and the reasoning faculty
seemed at an end. He was mute and passive;
excepting that fits of child-like weeping would
sometimes come over him without any
immediate
cause. If I left the room at any time, his
eye was incessantly fixed on the door till my
return
,
and on my entrance there was another gush
of tears.
To talk with him of my concerns, in this
ruined
state of mind, would have been worse than
useless: to have left him, for ever so short a
time, would have been cruel, unnatural. Here
then was a new trial for my affections. I wrote
to Bianca an account of my return and of my
actual
situation; painting in colours vivid, for they
were true, the torments I suffered at our being
thus separated; for to the youthful lover every
day of absence is an age of love lost. I
enclosed
the letter in one to Filippo who was the
channel
of our correspondence. I received a reply
from him full of friendship and sympathy; from
Bianca full of assurances of affection and
constancy
.
Week after week; month after month elapsed,
without making any change in my
circumstances
.
The vital flame, which had seemed
nearly extinct when first I met my father, kept
fluttering on without any apparent diminution.
I watched him constantly, faithfullyI had
almost
said patiently. I knew that his death alone
would set me free; yet I never at any moment
wished it. I felt too glad to be able to make any
atonement for past disobedience; and, denied
as I had been all endearments of relationship in
my early days, my heart yearned towards a
father
,
who, in his age and helplessness, had
thrown himself entirely on me for comfort. My
passion for Bianca gained daily more force from
absence; by constant meditation it wore itself a
deeper and deeper channel. I made no new
friends nor acquaintance; sought none of the
pleasures of Naples which my rank and fortune
threw open to me. Mine was a heart that
confined
itself to few objects, but dwelt upon those
with the intenser passion. To sit by my father,
and administer to his wants, and to meditate
on Bianca in the silence of his chamber, was my
constant habit. Sometimes I amused myself
with my pencil in portraying the image that
was ever present to my imagination. I
transferred
to canvas every look and smile of hers
that dwelt in my heart. I showed them to my
father in hopes of awakening an interest in his
bosom for the mere shadow of my love; but he
was too far sunk in intellect to take any more
than a child-like notice of them.
When I received a letter from Bianca it was
a new source of solitary luxury. Her
letters
,
it is true, were less and less frequent, but
they were always full of assurances of unabated
affection. They breathed not the frank and
innocent
warmth, with which she expressed
herself
in conversation, but I accounted for it from
the embarrassment which inexperienced minds
have often to express themselves upon paper.
Filippo assured me of her unaltered constancy.
They both lamented in the strongest terms our
continued separation, though they did justice to
the filial feeling that kept me by my father's side.
Part I. 20
Nearly eighteen months elapsed in this
protracted
exile. To me they were so many ages.
Ardent and impetuous by nature, I scarcely
know how I should have supported so long an
absence, had I not felt assured that the faith of
Bianca was equal to my own. At length my
father
died. Life went from him almost
imperceptibly
.
I hung over him in mute affliction, and
watched the expiring spasms of nature. His
last faltering accents whispered repeatedly a
blessing
on mealas! how has it been fulfilled!
When I had paid due honours to his remains,
and laid them in the tomb of our ancestors, I
arranged
briefly my affairs; put them in a
posture
to be easily at my command from a
distance
,
and embarked once more, with a bounding
heart for Genoa.
Our voyage was propitious, and oh! what
was my rapture when first, in the dawn of
morning
,
I saw the shadowy summits of the
Apennines
rising almost like clouds above the horizon.
The sweet breath of summer just moved us
over the long wavering billows that were rolling
us on towards Genoa. By degrees the coast of
Sestri rose like a sweet creation of enchantment
from the silver bosom of the deep. I beheld the
line of villages and palaces studding its borders.
My eye reverted to a well-known point, and at
length, from the confusion of distant objects, it
singled out the villa which contained Bianca. It
was a mere speck in the landscape, but
glimmering
from afar, the polar star of my heart.
Again I gazed at it for a livelong summer's
day; but oh how different the emotions between
departure and return. It now kept growing and
growing, instead of lessening and lessening on
my sight. My heart seemed to dilate with it.
I looked at it through a telescope. I gradually
defined one feature after another. The
balconies
of the central saloon where first I met
Bianca beneath its roof; the terrace where we
so often had passed the delightful summer
evenings; the awning that shaded her chamber
windowI almost fancied I saw her form beneath
it. Could she but know her lover was in the
bark whose white sail now gleamed on the sunny
bosom of the sea! My fond impatience
increased
as we neared the coast. The ship seemed to
lag lazily over the billows; I could almost have
sprung into the sea and swam to the desired
shore.
The shadows of evening gradually shrowded
the scene, but the moon arose in all her fullness
and beauty, and shed the tender light so dear to
lovers, over the romantic coast of Sestri. My
whole soul was bathed in unutterable tenderness.
I anticipated the heavenly evenings I should
pass in wandering with Bianca by the light of
that blessed moon.
It was late at night before we entered the
harbour
.
As early next morning as I could get
released
from the formalities of landing I threw
myself on horseback and hastened to the villa.
As I gallopped round the rocky promontory on
which stands the Faro, and saw the coast of
Sestri
opening upon me, a thousand anxieties and
doubts suddenly sprang up in my bosom. There
is something fearfu in returning to those we love,
while yet uncertain what ills or changes absence
may have effected. The turbulence of my
agitation
shook my very frame. I spurred my horse
to redoubled speed; he was covered with foam
when we both arrived panting at the gateway that
opened to the grounds around the villa. I left my
horse at a cottage and walked through the grounds
that I might regain tranquillity for the
approaching
interview. I child myself for having suffered
mere doubts and surmises thus suddenly to
overcome
me; but I was always prone to be carried
away by these gusts of the feelings.
On entering the garden every thing bore the
same look as when I had left it; and this
unchanged
aspect of things reassured me. There
were the alleys in which I had so often walked
with Bianca; the same shades under which we
had so often sat during the noontide heat. There
were the same flowers of which she was fond;
and which appeared still to be under the ministry
of her hand. Every thing around looked and
breathed of Bianca; hope and joy flushed in my
bosom at every step. I passed a little bower in
which we had often sat and read together. A
book and a glove lay on the bench. It was
Bianca's
glove; it was a volume of the Metestasio
I had given her. The glove lay in my favourite
passage. I clasped them to my heart. All is
safe! exclaimed I, with rapture, she loves me!
she is still my own!
I bounded lightly along the avenue down which
I had faltered so slowly at my departure. I
beheld
her favourite pavilion which had witnessed
our parting scene. The window was open, with
the same vine clambering about it, precisely as
when she waved and wept me an adieu. Oh!
how transporting was the contrast in my
situation
.
As I passed near the pavilion, I heard the
tones of a female voice. They thrilled through
me with an appeal to my heart not to be
mistaken
.
Before I could think, I
felt
they were
Bianca's
.
For an instant I paused, overpowered
with agitation. I feared to break in suddenly
upon her. I softly ascended the steps of the
pavilion
.
The door was open. I saw Bianca
seated
at a table; her back was towards me; she
was warbling a soft melancholy air, and was
occupied
in drawing. A glance sufficed to show
me that she was copying one of my own
paintings
.
I gazed on her for a moment in a delicious
tumult of emotions. She paused in her singing;
a heavy sigh, almost a sob followed. I could no
longer contain myself. Bianca! exclaimed
I, in a half smothered voice. She started at the
sound; brushed back the ringlets that hung
clustering about her face; darted a glance at
me; uttered a piercing shriek, and would have
fallen to the earth, had I not caught her in my
arms.
Bianca! my own Bianca! exclaimed I,
folding her to my bosom; my voice stifled in
sobs of convulsive joy. She lay in my arms
without sense or motion. Alarmed at the effects
of my own precipitation, I scarce knew what to
do. I tried by a thousand endearing words to
call her back to consciousness. She slowly
recovered
,
and half opening her eyeswhere am
I? murmured she faintly. Here, exclaimed
I, pressing her to my bosom, Here,! close to
the heart that adores you; in the arms of your
faithful Ottavio!
Oh no! no! no! shrieked she, starting into
sudden life and terroraway! away! leave
me! leave me!
She tore herself from my arms; rushed to a
corner of the saloon, and covered her face with
her hands, as if the very sight of me were
baleful
.
I was thunderstruckI could not believe
my senses. I followed her, trembling,
confounded
.
I endeavoured to take her hand, but
she shrunk from my very touch with horror.
Good heavens, Bianca, exclaimed I, what
is the meaning of this? Is this my reception
after so long an absence? Is this the love you
professed for me?
At the mention of love, a shuddering ran
through her. She turned to me a face wild with
anguish. No more of that! no more of that!
gasped shetalk not to me of loveIIam
married!
I reeled as if I had received a mortal blow.
A sickness struck to my very heart. I caught
at a window frame for support. For a moment
or two, every thing was chaos around me. When
I recovered, I beheld Bianca lying on a sofa;
her face buried in the pillow, and sobbing
convulsively
.
Indignation at her fickleness for a
moment overpowered every other feeling.
Faithlessperjured cried I, striding
across the room. But another glance at that
beautiful being in distress, checked all my wrath.
Anger could not dwell together with her idea in
my soul.
Oh Bianca, exclaimed I, in anguish, could
I have dreamt of this; could I have suspected
you would have been false to me?
She raised her face all streaming with tears,
all disordered with emotion, and gave me one
appealing lookFalse to you!they told
me you were dead!
What, said I, in spite of our constant
correspondence
?
She gazed wildly at mecorrespondence!
what correspondence?
Part I. 21
Have you not repeatedly received and
replied
to my letters?
She clasped her hands with solemnity and
fervourAs I hope for mercy, never!
A horrible surmise shot through my brain
Who told you I was dead?
It was reported that the ship in which you
embarked for Naples perished at sea.
But who told you the report?
She paused for an instant, and trembled
Filippo!
May the God of heaven curse him! cried I,
extending my clinched fists aloft.
Oh do not curse himdo not curse him!
exclaimed sheHe ishe ismy husband!
This was all that was wanting to unfold the
perfidy that had been practised upon me. My
blood boiled like liquid fire in my veins. I gasped
with rage too great for utterance. I remained
for a time bewildered by the whirl of horrible
thoughts that rushed through my mind. The
poor victim of deception before me thought it
was with her I was incensed. She faintly
murmured
forth her exculpation. I will not dwell
upon it. I saw in it more than she meant to
reveal
.
I saw with a glance how both of us had
been betrayed. 'Tis well! muttered I to
myself
in smothered accents of concentrated fury.
He shall account to me for this!
Bianca overheard me. New terror flashed in
her countenance. For mercy's sake do not
meet himsay nothing of what has passedfor
my sake say nothing to himI only shall be the
sufferer!
A new suspicion darted across my mind
what! exclaimed Ido you then
fear
him
is he
unkind
to youtell me reiterated I,
grasping her hand and looking her eagerly in the
facetell me
dares
he to use you harshly!
No! no! no! cried she faltering and
embarrassed
;
but the glance at her face had told
me volumes. I saw in her pallid and wasted
features; in the prompt terror and subdued
agony of her eye a whole history of a mind
broken
down by tyranny. Great God! and was
this beauteous flower snatched from me to be
thus trampled upon. The idea roused me to
madness. I clinched my teeth and my hands;
I foamed at the mouth; every passion seemed to
have resolved itself into the fury that like a lava
boiled within my heart. Bianca shrunk from
me in speechless affright. As I strode by the
window
my eye darted down the alley. Fatal
moment
!
I beheld Filippo at a distance! My brain
was in deliriumI sprang from the pavilion,
and was before him with the quickness of
lightning
.
He saw me as I came rushing upon him
he turned pale, looked wildly to right and left,
as if he would have fled, and trembling drew his
sword:
Wretch! cried I, well may you draw your
weapon!
I spake not another wordI snatched forth
a stiletto, put by the sword which trembled in
his hand, and buried my poniard in his bosom.
He fell with the blow, but my rage was unsated.
I sprang upon him with the blood-thirsty feeling
of a tiger; redoubled my blows; mangled him
in my frenzy, grasped him by the throat, until
with reiterated wounds and strangling
convulsions
he expired in my grasp. I remained
glaring
on the countenance, horrible in death, that
seemed to stare back with its protruded eyes upon
me. Piercing shrieks roused me from my
delirium
.
I looked round and beheld Bianca flying
distractedly towards us. My brain whirled. I
waited not to meet her, but fled from the scene
of horror. I fled forth from the garden like
another Cain, a hell within my bosom, and a
curse upon my head. I fled without knowing
whitheralmost without knowing whymy
only idea was to get farther and farther from the
horrors I had left behind; as if I could throw
space between myself and my conscience. I fled
to the Apennines, and wandered for days and
days among their savage heights. How I
existed
I cannot tellwhat rocks and precipices I
braved, and how I braved them, I know not. I
kept on and ontrying to outtravel the curse
that clung to me. Alas, the shrieks of Bianca
rung for ever in my ear. The horrible
countenance
of my victim was for ever before my eyes.
The blood of Filippo cried to me from the
ground. Rocks, trees, and torrents all
resounded
with my crime.
Then it was I felt how much more
insupportable
is the anguish of remorse than every
other mental pang. Oh! could I but have cast
off this crime that festered in my heart; could I
but have regained the innocence that reigned in
my breast as I entered the garden at Sestri; could
I but have restored my victim to life, I felt as if
I could look on with transport even though
Bianca
were in his arms.
By degrees this frenzied fever of remorse
settled
into a permanent malady of the mind. Into
one of the most horrible that ever poor wretch
was cursed with. Wherever I went the
countenance
of him I had slain appeared to follow me.
Wherever I turned my head I beheld it behind
me, hideous with the contortions of the dying
moment. I have tried in every way to escape
from this horrible phantom; but in vain. I
know not whether it is an illusion of the mind,
the consequence of my dismal education at the
convent, or whether a phantom really sent by
heaven to punish me; but there it ever isat all
timesin all placesnor has time nor habit had
any effect in familiarizing me with its terrors.
I have travelled from place to place, plunged
into amusementstried dissipation and
distraction
of every kindallall in vain.
I once had recourse to my pencil as a
desperate
experiment. I painted an exact resemblance
of this phantom face. I placed it before me in
hopes that by constantly contemplating the copy
I might diminish the effect of the original. But
I only doubled instead of diminishing the misery.
Such is the curse that has clung to my
footsteps
that
has made my life a burthenbut
the thoughts of death, terrible. God knows what
I have suffered. What days and days, and
nights and nights, of sleepless torment. What
a never-dying worm has preyed upon my heart;
what an unquenchable fire has burned within
my brain. He knows the wrongs that wrought
upon my poor weak nature; that converted the
tenderest of affections into the deadliest of fury.
He knows best whether a frail erring creature
has expiated by long-enduring torture and
measureless
remorse, the crime of a moment of
madness
.
Often, often have I prostrated myself in
the dust, and implored that he would give me a
sign of his forgiveness, and let me die.
Thus far had I written some time since. I
had meant to leave this record of misery and
crime with you, to be read when I should be no
more. My prayer to heaven has at length been
heard. You were witness to my emotions last
evening at the performance of the Miserere; when
the vaulted temple resounded with the words of
atonement and redemption. I heard a voice
speaking to me from the midst of the music; I
heard it rising above the pealing of the organ
and the voices of the choir: it spoke to me in
tones of celestial melody; it promised mercy and
forgiveness, but demanded from me full
expiation
.
I go to make it. To-morrow I shall be
on my way to Genoa to surrender myself to
justice. You who have pitied my sufferings;
who have poured the balm of sympathy into my
wounds, do not shrink from my memory with
abhorrence now that you know my story.
Recollect
,
when you read of my crime I shall have
atoned for it with my blood!
When the Baronet had finished, there was an
universal desire expressed to see the painting of
this frightful visage. After much entreaty the
Baronet consented, on condition that they should
only visit it one by one. He called his
housekeeper
and gave her charge to conduct the
gentlemen
singly to the chamber. They all
returned
varying in their stories: some affected in
one way, some in another; some more, some
less; but all agreeing that there was a certain
something about the painting that had a very odd
effect upon the feelings.
I stood in a deep bow window with the
Baronet
,
and could not help expressing my wonder.
After all, said I, there are certain
mysteries
in our nature, certain inscrutable impulses
and influences, that warrant one in being
superstitious
.
Who can account for so many persons
Part I. 22
of different characters being thus strangely
affected
by a mere painting?
And especially when not one of them has
seen it! said the Baronet with a smile.
How? exclaimed I, not seen it?
Not one of them! replied he, laying his
finger
on his lips in sign of secrecy. I saw that
some of them were in a bantering vein, and I did
not choose that the momento of the poor Italian
should be made a jest of. So I gave the
housekeeper
a hint to show them all to a different
chamber!
Thus end the Stories of the Nervous
Gentleman
.